
Leon Trotsky



RESULTS AND PROSPECTS


(1906)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Transcribed and HTML markup for the Trotsky Internet Archive, a
subarchive of the Marxists Internet Archive, by Sally Ryan in 1996.
First publication of RESULTS & PROSPECTS was in St. Petersburg in 1906,
shortly after the 1905 first Russian workers’ revolution, lead in large
part by Trotsky himself.
The first English translation was published by the Communist
International in 1921.
Converted to eBook format by Kollektiv Yakov Perelman from the on-line
version of RESULTS AND PROSPECTS available at Trotsky Internet Archive
on 20 January 2013.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

-   Preface to the Re-Issue of This Work Published in Moscow in 1919
     
-   Introduction
     
-   I. The Peculiarities of Russian Historical Development
     
-   II. The Towns and Capital
     
-   III. 1789 – 1848 – 1905
     
-   IV. Revolution and the Proletariat
     
-   V. The Proletariat in Power and the Peasantry
     
-   VI. The Proletarian Regime
     
-   VII. The Prerequisites of Socialism
     
-   VIII. A Workers’ Government in Russia and Socialism
     
-   IX. Europe and Revolution
     
-   X. The Struggle for Power
     



PREFACE TO THE RE-ISSUE OF THIS WORK


Published in Moscow in 1919

 

 

The character of the Russian Revolution was the fundamental question in
relation to which the various ideological trends and political
organizations of the Russian revolutionary movement grouped themselves.
Even in the social-democratic movement itself this question aroused
serious disagreements from the moment events gave it a practical
character. From 1904 onwards these differences took the shape of two
fundamental trends, Menshevism and Bolshevism. The Menshevik point of
view was that our revolution would be a _bourgeois_ revolution, i.e.,
that its natural consequence would be the transfer of power to the
bourgeoisie and the creation of conditions for bourgeois
parliamentarism. The point of view of Bolshevism, while recognizing the
inevitability of the bourgeois character of the coming revolution, put
forward as the task of the revolution the establishment of a democratic
republic by means of the dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry.

The social analysis of the Mensheviks was extremely superficial and in
essence reduced itself to crude historical analogies – the typical
method of ‘educated’ philistines. Neither the fact that the development
of Russian capitalism had created extraordinary contradictions at both
its poles, reducing the role of bourgeois democracy to insignificance,
nor the experience of subsequent events, restrained the Mensheviks from
an indefatigable search for ‘true’, ‘real’ democracy, which would place
itself at the head of the ‘nation’ and establish parliamentary and so
far as possible democratic conditions for capitalist development. Always
and everywhere the Mensheviks strove to find signs of the development of
bourgeois democracy, and where they could not find them they invented
them. They exaggerated the importance of every ‘democratic’ declaration
and demonstration, at the same time belittling the forces of the
proletariat and the prospects before its struggle. So fanatically did
they strive to find this leading bourgeois democracy, in order to secure
the ‘legitimate’ bourgeois character of the Russian Revolution alleged
to be required by the laws of history, that during the Revolution
itself, when no leading bourgeois democracy was to be found, the
Mensheviks themselves undertook, with more or less success, to carry out
its duties.

Petty-bourgeois democracy without any Socialist ideology, without any
Marxian class preparation, could not, of course, have acted differently
under the conditions of the Russian Revolution, than did the Mensheviks
in the role of the ‘leading’ Party of the February Revolution. The
absence of any serious social foundation for bourgeois democracy told on
the Mensheviks themselves, because they very soon outlived themselves,
and in the eighth month of the Revolution were thrown aside by the class
struggle.

Bolshevism, on the contrary, was by no means imbued with faith in the
power and strength of revolutionary bourgeois democracy in Russia. From
the very beginning, it acknowledged the decisive importance of the
working class for the coming Revolution, but as to the programme of the
Revolution itself the Bolsheviks limited it at first to the interests of
the many millions of peasants, without and against whom the Revolution
could not have been carried through to the end by the proletariat. Hence
their acknowledgment (for the time being) of the _bourgeois_-democratic
character of the Revolution.

As regards the estimation of the inner forces of the Revolution and its
prospects, the author, at that period, adhered neither to one nor to the
other of the main trends in the Russian Labour movement. The standpoint
he then supported can be outlined as follows: the Revolution, having
begun as a bourgeois revolution as regards its first tasks, will soon
call forth powerful class conflicts and will gain final victory only by
transferring power to the only class capable of standing at the head of
the oppressed masses, namely, to the proletariat. Once in power, the
proletariat not only will not want, but will not be able to limit itself
to a bourgeois democratic programme. It will be able to carry through
the Revolution to the end only in the event of the Russian Revolution
being converted into a Revolution of the European proletariat. The
bourgeois-democratic programme of the Revolution will then be
superseded, together with its national limitations, and the temporary
political domination of the Russian working class will develop into a
prolonged Socialist dictatorship. But should Europe remain inert the
bourgeois counter-revolution will not tolerate the government of the
toiling masses in Russia and will throw the country back – far back from
a democratic workers’ and peasants’ republic. Therefore, once having won
power, the proletariat cannot keep within the limits of bourgeois
democracy. It must adopt the tactics of _permanent revolution_, i.e.,
must destroy the barriers between the minimum and maximum programme of
Social Democracy, go over to more and more radical social reforms and
seek direct and immediate support in revolution in Western Europe. This
position is developed and argued in the work now reissued, which was
originally written in 1904-1906.

In maintaining the standpoint of the permanent revolution during a
period of 15 years, the author nevertheless fell into error in his
estimation of the contending factions of the social-democratic movement.
As both of them started out from the standpoint of _bourgeois_
revolution, the author was of the opinion that the divergencies existing
between them would not be so deep as to justify a split. At the same
time, he hoped that the further course of events would clearly prove the
weakness and insignificance of Russian bourgeois democracy, on the one
hand, and on the other, the objective impossibility of the proletariat
limiting itself to a democratic programme. This he thought would remove
the ground from under factional differences.

Having stood outside both of the two factions in the period of
emigration, the author did not fully appreciate the very important
circumstance that in reality, along the line of the disagreement between
Bolsheviks and Mensheviks, there were being grouped inflexible
revolutionaries on the one side and, on the other, elements which were
becoming more and more opportunist and accommodating. When the
Revolution of 1917 broke out, the Bolshevik Party constituted a strong
centralized organization uniting all the best elements of the advanced
workers and revolutionary intellectuals, which – after some internal
struggle – frankly adopted tactics directed towards the socialist
dictatorship of the working class, in full harmony with the entire
international situation and class relations in Russia. As to the
Menshevik faction, it had, by that time, just ripened sufficiently to be
able to assume, as I said before, the duties of bourgeois democracy.

In offering to the public this reprint of his book at the present time,
the author not only desires to explain the theoretical principles which
rendered it possible for him and other comrades, who for many years had
stood outside the Bolshevik Party, to join their fate with the fate of
that party at the beginning of 1917 (such a personal explanation would
not provide a sufficient reason for the reprinting of the book), but
also to recall the social-historical analysis of the motive forces of
the Russian Revolution from which followed the conclusion that the
seizure of political power by the working class could and must be the
task of the Russian Revolution, long before the proletarian dictatorship
had become an accomplished fact. The fact that it is possible for us now
to re-issue without alteration this pamphlet written in 1906 and
conceived in its fundamental lines already in 1904, is sufficient proof
that Marxist theory is not on the side of the Menshevik substitutes for
bourgeois democracy but on the side of the party which actually carries
out the dictatorship of the working class.

The final test of a theory is experience. Irrefutable proof of our
having correctly applied Marxist theory is given by the fact that the
events in which we are now participating, and even our methods of
participation in them, were foreseen in their fundamental lines some 15
years ago.

As an appendix we reprint an article which was published in the Paris
NASHE SLOVO for October 17th, 1915, entitled _The Struggle for Power_.
This article had a polemical purpose and was a criticism of the
programmatic _Letter_ addressed to ‘Comrades in Russia’ by the leaders
of the Mensheviks. In it we drew the conclusion that the development of
class relations during the ten years after the revolution of 1905 had
yet further undermined the Menshevik hope for a bourgeois democracy, and
that thereby, obviously, the fate of the Russian Revolution was more
than ever bound up with the question of the dictatorship of the
proletariat ... In the face of the battle of ideas of all these many
preceding years, one must indeed be a blockhead to speak of the
‘adventurism’ of the October Revolution!

Talking of the attitude of the Mensheviks to the Revolution, one cannot
but mention the Menshevik degeneration of Kautsky, who in the ‘theories’
of Martov, Dan and Tsereteli now finds the expression of his own
theoretical and political decay. After October 1917, we heard from
Kautsky that, although the conquest of political power by the working
class should be regarded as the historic task of the Social-Democratic
Party, nevertheless, as the Russian Communist Party had failed to come
to power through the particular door and according to the particular
timetable fixed for it by Kautsky, the Soviet Republic ought to be
handed over for correction to Kerensky, Tsereteli and Chernov. Kautsky’s
reactionary-pedantic criticism must have come the more unexpectedly to
those comrades who had gone through the period of the first Russian
Revolution with their eyes open and had read Kautsky’s articles of
1905-1906. At that time Kautsky (true, not without the beneficial
influence of Rosa Luxemburg) fully understood and acknowledged that the
Russian Revolution could not terminate in a bourgeois-democratic
republic but must inevitably lead to the proletarian dictatorship,
because of the level attained by the class struggle in the country
itself and because of the entire international situation of capitalism.
Kautsky then frankly wrote about a workers’ government with a
social-democratic majority. He did not even think of making the real
course of the class struggle depend on the changing and superficial
combinations of political democracy.

At that time, Kautsky understood that the Revolution would begin for the
first time to rouse the many millions of peasants and urban
petty-bourgeoisie and that not all at once but gradually, layer by
layer, so that when the struggle between the proletariat and the
capitalist bourgeoisie reached its climax, the broad peasant masses
would still be at a very primitive level of political development and
would give their votes to intermediary political parties reflecting only
the backwardness and the prejudices of the peasant class. Kautsky
understood then that the proletariat, led by the logic of the revolution
toward the conquest of power, could not arbitrarily postpone this act
indefinitely, because by this self-abnegation it would merely clear the
field for counter-revolution. Kautsky understood then that, once having
seized revolutionary power, the proletariat would not make the fate of
the revolution depend upon the passing moods of the least conscious, not
yet awakened masses at any given moment, but that, on the contrary, it
would turn the political power concentrated in its hands into a mighty
apparatus for the enlightenment and organization of these same backward
and ignorant peasant masses. Kautsky understood that to call the Russian
Revolution a bourgeois revolution and thereby to limit its tasks would
mean not to understand anything of what was going on in the world.
Together with the Russian and Polish revolutionary Marxists, he rightly
acknowledged that, should the Russian proletariat conquer power before
the European proletariat, it would have to use its situation as the
ruling class not for the rapid surrender of its positions to the
bourgeoisie but for rendering powerful assistance to the proletarian
revolution in Europe and throughout the world. All these world-wide
prospects, imbued with the spirit of Marxian doctrine, were not made
dependent either by Kautsky or by us upon how and for whom the peasants
would vote at the elections to the so-called Constituent Assembly in
November and December 1917.

Now, when the prospects outlined 15 years ago have become reality,
Kautsky refuses to grant a birth-certificate to the Russian Revolution
for the reason that its birth has not been duly registered at the
political office of bourgeois democracy. What an astonishing fact! What
an incredible degradation of Marxism! One can say with full justice that
the decay of the Second International has found in this philistine
judgment on the Russian Revolution by one of its greatest theoreticians
a still more hideous expression than in the voting of the War credits on
August 4, 1914.

For decades Kautsky developed and upheld the ideas of social revolution.
Now that it has become reality, Kautsky retreats before it in terror. He
is horrified at the Russian Soviet power and takes up a hostile attitude
towards the mighty movement of the German Communist proletariat. Kautsky
resembles to the life a miserable schoolmaster, who for many years has
been repeating a description of spring to his pupils within the four
walls of his stuffy schoolroom, and when at last, at the sunset of his
days as a teacher, he comes out into the fresh air, does not recognize
spring, becomes furious (in so far as it is possible for this
schoolmaster to become furious) and tries to prove that spring is not
spring after all but only a great disorder in nature, because it is
taking place against the laws of natural history. It is well that the
workers do not trust even to the most authoritative pedants, but trust
the voice of spring!

We, disciples of Marx, together with the German workers, stand by our
conviction that the spring of revolution has arrived fully in accordance
with the laws of social nature, and at the same time in accordance with
the laws of Marxist theory, for Marxism is not a schoolmaster’s pointer
rising above history, but a social analysis of the ways and means of the
historic process which is really going on.

I have left the text of the two works – that of 1906 and that of 1915 –
without any alterations. Originally I intended to supply the text with
notes which would bring it up to date; but on looking through the text I
had to renounce this intention. If I wanted to go into details, I should
have to double the size of the book, for which I have no time at present
– and, besides, such a ‘two-storeyed’ book would hardly be convenient
for the reader. And, what is more important, I consider that the train
of ideas in its main ramifications very nearly approaches the conditions
of our time, and the reader who takes the trouble to get more thoroughly
acquainted with this book will easily be able to supplement the
exposition it gives with the necessary data taken from the experience of
the present Revolution.

L. TROTSKY
March 12, 1919
The Kremlin



INTRODUCTION


 

 

The Russian Revolution came unexpectedly to everybody but the Social
Democrats. Marxism long ago predicted the inevitability of the Russian
Revolution, which was bound to break out as a result of the conflict
between capitalist development and the forces of ossified absolutism.
Marxism estimated in advance the social character of the coming
revolution. In calling it a bourgeois revolution, Marxism thereby
pointed out that the _immediate objective_ tasks of the revolution
consisted in the creation of “normal conditions for the development of
bourgeois society as a whole.

Marxism has proved to be right, and this is now past the need for
discussion or proof. The Marxists are now confronted by a task of quite
another kind: to discover the ‘possibilities’ of the developing
revolution by means of an analysis of its internal mechanism. It would
be a stupid mistake to identify our revolution with the events of
1789-93 or 1848. Historical analogies, by which liberalism lives and is
nurtured, cannot take the place of social analysis.

The Russian Revolution has a quite peculiar character, which is the
result of the peculiar trend of our whole social and historical
development, and which in its turn opens before us quite new historical
prospects.



I THE PECULIARITIES OF RUSSIAN HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENT


 

 

If we compare social development in Russia with social development in
the other European countries – bracketing the latter together in respect
of that which their history has in common and which distinguishes it
from the history of Russia – we can say that the main characteristic of
Russian social development is its comparative primitiveness and
slowness.

We shall not dwell here on the natural causes of this primitiveness, but
the fact itself remains indubitable: Russian social life has been built
up on a poorer and more primitive economic foundation.

Marxism teaches that the development of the forces of production
determines the social-historical process. The formation of economic
corporations, classes and estates is only possible when this development
has reached a certain level. Estate [1] and class differentiation, which
is determined by the development of the division of labour and the
creation of more specialized social functions, presupposes that the part
of the population employed on immediate material production produces a
surplus over and above its own consumption: it is only by alienating
this surplus that non-producing classes can arise and take shape.
Furthermore, the division of labour among the producing classes
themselves is possible only at a certain degree of development of
agriculture, capable of ensuring the supply of agricultural produce to
the non-agricultural population. These fundamental propositions of
social development were already clearly formulated by Adam Smith.

Hence it follows that, although the Novgorod period of our history
coincides with the beginning of the European Middle Ages, the slow pace
of economic development caused by the natural-historical conditions
(less favourable geographical situation, sparse population) was bound to
hamper the process of class formation and to give it a more primitive
character.

It is difficult to say what shape Russian social development would have
taken if it had remained isolated and under the influence of inner
tendencies only. It is enough to say that this did not happen. Russian
social life, built up on a certain internal economic foundation, has all
the time been under the influence, even under the pressure, of its
external social-historical milieu.

When this social and state organization, in the process of its
formation, came into collision with other, neighbouring organizations,
the primitiveness of the economic relations of the one and the
comparatively high development of the others played decisive parts in
the ensuing process.

The Russian state, which grew up on a primive economic basis, entered
into relations and came into conflict with state organizations built
upon higher and more stable foundations. Two possibilities presented
themselves: either the Russian State was to succumb in its struggle with
them, as the Golden Horde had succumbed in its struggle with the Moscow
State, or it was to overtake them in the development of economic
relations and absorb a great deal more vital forces than it could have
done had it remained isolated. The economy of Russia, however, was
already _sufficiently_ developed to prevent the former happening. The
State did not break down but started growing under the terrible pressure
of economic forces.

Thus, the main thing was not that Russia was surrounded by enemies on
all sides. This alone does not explain the position. Indeed, this would
apply to any other European country, except, perhaps, England. In their
mutual struggle for existence, these states depended upon more or less
identical economic bases and therefore the development of their state
organizations was not subject to such powerful _external_ pressure.

The struggle against the Crimean and Nogai Tatars called forth the
utmost exertion of effort. But this was, of course, not greater than the
exertion of effort during the hundred years’ war between France and
England. It was not the Tatars who compelled Old Russia to introduce
firearms and create the standing regiments of Streltsi; it was not the
Tatars who later on forced her to form knightly cavalry and infantry
forces, but the pressure of Lithuania, Poland and Sweden.

As a consequence of this pressure on the part of Western Europe, the
State swallowed up an inordinately large part of the surplus produce;
i.e., it lived at the expense of the privileged classes which were being
formed, and so hampered their already slow development. But that was not
all. The State pounced upon the ‘necessary product’ of the farmer,
deprived him of his livelihood, caused him to flee from the land upon
which he had not even had time to settle – and thus hampered the growth
of the population and the development of the productive forces. Thus,
inasmuch as the State swallowed up a disproportionately large part of
the _surplus_ product, it hampered the already slow differentiation
between estates; inasmuch as it took away an important part of the
_necessary_ product it destroyed even those primitive production bases
upon which it depended.

But in order to exist, to function, and therefore,a bove all, to
alienate the part of the social product it required, _the State needed a
hierarchical organization of estates._ This is why, while undermining
the economic foundations of its development, it simultaneously strove to
force the development of these foundations by Government measures, and –
like any other State – strove to turn this development of estates to its
own advantage. Milyukov, the historian of Russian culture, sees in this
a direct contrast to the history of Western Europe. But there is no
contrast here.

The estates-monarchy of the Middle Ages, which grew into bureaucratic
absolutism, constituted a state form reinforcing certain definite social
interests and relations. But this state form itself, once it had arisen
and was in being, had its own interests (dynastic, court, bureaucratic
...) which came into conflict not only with the interests of the lower
but even with those of the higher estates. The dominating estates, which
constituted the socially indispensable ‘middle wall’ between the masses
of the people and the State organization, exercised pressure on the
latter and made their own interests the content of the State’s practical
activity. At the same time, the State power, as an independent force,
also looked upon the interests of the higher estates from _its own_
point of view. It developed resistance to their aspirations and tried to
subject them to itself. The actual history of the relations between
State and estates proceeded along resultant lines, determined by the
correlation of forces.

A process identical in fundamentals took place in Russia.

The State strove to make use of the developing economic groups, to
subject them to its own specialized financial and military interests.
The dominating economic groups, as they arose, strove to use the State
to consolidate their advantages in the form of estate privileges. In
this play of social forces, the resultant went much more in favour of
the State power than was the case in the history of Western Europe. The
exchange of services between the State power and the upper social
groups, at the expense of the working masses, which finds its expression
in the distribution of rights and obligations, of burdens and
privileges, was less advantageous to the nobility and clergy in Russia
than in the mediaeval estates-monarchies of Western Europe. This is
beyond doubt. Nevertheless, it would be a great exaggeration and
contrary to all sense of proportion to say that while in the West the
estates created the State, in Russia the State power created the estates
in its own interests (as Milyukov does).

Estates cannot be created by State action, by law. Before one or another
social group can take shape as a privileged estate with the help of the
State power, it must have developed economically with all its social
advantages. Estates cannot be manufactured according to a previously
established scale of ranks or according to the code of the Legion
d’Honneur. The State power can but assist, with all its resources, the
elementary economic process which brings forward higher economic
formations. As indicated above, the Russian State consumed a
comparatively large share of the forces of the nation, thus hampering
the process of social crystallization, but it needed this process for
its own purposes. It is natural, therefore, that under the influence and
the pressure of its more differentiated Western milieu, a pressure that
was transmitted through the military-state organization, the State in
its turn strove to force the development of social differentiation on a
primitive economic foundation. Furthermore, the very need for forcing,
caused by the weakness of the social-economic formations, made it
natural that the State in its efforts as guardian should have tried to
use its preponderant power to direct the very development of the upper
classes according to its own discretion. But on the way to the
achievement of great success in this direction, the State first found
itself baulked by its own weakness and the primitive character of its
own organization, which was due, as we have seen, to the primitiveness
of the social structure.

Thus, the Russian State, erected on the basis of Russian economic
conditions, was being pushed forward by the friendly, and even more by
the hostile, pressure of the neighbouring State organizations, which had
grown up on a higher economic basis. From a certain moment – especially
from the end of the seventeenth century – the State strove with all its
power to accelerate the country’s natural economic development. New
branches of handicraft, machinery, factories, big industry, capital,
were, so to say, artificially grafted on the natural economic stem.
Capitalism seemed to be an offspring of the State.

From this standpoint it could be said that all Russian science is the
artificial product of government effort, an artificial grafting on the
natural stem of national ignorance. [2]

Russian thought, like the Russian economy, developed under the direct
pressure the higher thought and more developed economies of the West.
Since, owing to the natural-economy character of economic conditions,
i.e., the poor development of foreign trade, relations with other
countries bore a predominantly State character, the influence of these
countries found expression in fierce struggle for the existence of the
State before expressing itself in direct economic competition. Western
economics influenced Russian economics through the intermediary of the
State. In order to be able to survive in the midst of better-armed
hostile countries, Russia was compelled to set up factories, organize
navigation schools, publish textbooks on fortification, etc. But if the
general course of the internal economy of this enormous country had not
been moving in this same direction, if the development of economic
conditions had not created the demand for general and applied science,
all the efforts of the State would have been fruitless. The national
economy, which was naturally developing from natural economy to
money-commodity economy, responded only to those measures of the
Government which corresponded to its development and only to the extent
that they corresponded to it. The history of Russian industry, of the
Russian currency system, and of State credit, are the best possible
evidence for the above opinion.

‘The majority of the branches of industry (metal, sugar, petroleum,
distilling, even the textile industry),’ writes Professor Mendeleyev,
‘were originated under the direct influence of Government measures,
sometimes even with the help of large Government subsidies, but
especially because the Government always consciously followed the policy
of Protection. In the reign of Alexander, the Government frankly
inscribed this policy on its banner ... The higher Government circles,
fully accepting the principles of Protection in application to Russia,
proved to be more advanced than our educated classes as a whole.’ D.
Mendeleyev, TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING OF RUSSIA, St. Petersburg 1906,
p.84).

The learned panegyrist of industrial Protection forgets to add that the
policy of the Government was dictated not by any concern to develop
industrial forces, but purely by fiscal and in part military-technical
considerations. For this reason, the policy of Protection was often
opposed, not only to the fundamental interests of industrial development
but even to the private interests of various groups of businessmen.
Thus, the cotton-mill owners openly declared that ‘the high duties on
cotton are being maintained not with a view to encouraging
cotton-growing but exclusively for fiscal interests’. As in the
‘creation’ of estates the Government was pursuing, above all, the aims
of the State, so also in ‘planting’ industry, its main concern was
directed towards the requirements of the State Exchequer. There is no
doubt, however, that the autocracy played no small part in transplanting
the factory system of production on to Russian soil.

At the moment when developing bourgeois society began to feel a need for
the political institutions of the West, the autocracy proved to be armed
with all the material might of the European States. It rested upon a
centralized bureaucratic machine which was quite useless for
establishing new relations but was able to develop great energy in
carrying out systematic repressions. The enormous distances of the
country had been overcome by the telegraph, which imparts confidence to
the actions of the administration and gives relative uniformity and
rapidity to its proceedings (in the matter of repressions). The railways
render it possible to throw military forces rapidly from one end of the
country to the other. The pre-revolutionary governments of Europe hardly
knew railways and telegraphs. The army at the disposal of absolutism was
colossal – and if it proved useless in the serious trials of the
Japanese War, it was nevertheless good enough for internal domination.
Not only the Government of France before the great Revolution, but even
the Government of 1848, knew nothing similar to the Russian army of
today.

While exploiting the country to the utmost by means its fiscal and
military machine, the Government brought its yearly budget up to the
huge figure of two milliard roubles. Supported by its army and its
budget, the autocratic government made the European Stock Exchange its
exchequer, and the Russian taxpayer thus became a hopeless tributary of
this European Stock Exchange.

Thus, in the eighties and nineties of the nineteenth century, the
Russian Government confronted the world as a colossal
military-bureaucratic and fiscal – Stock-Exchange organization of
invincible power.

The financial and military might of the absolute monarchy overwhelmed
and blinded not only the European bourgeoisie but also Russian
liberalism, which lost all faith in the possibility of trying
conclusions with absolutism in an open measurement of strength. The
military and financial might of absolutism seemed to exclude any chance
whatever for the Russian Revolution. But in reality just the opposite
proved to be the case.

The more a government is centralized and the more independent it is of
society, the sooner it becomes an autocratic organization standing above
society. The greater the financial and military forces of such an
organization are, the longer and more successfully can it continue its
struggle for existence. The centralized State with its budget of two
milliards, its debt of eight milliards and its army of many millions of
men under arms, could continue to exist long after it had ceased to
satisfy the most elementary needs of social development – not only the
needs of internal administration but even the needs of military
security, for the maintenance of which it was originally formed.

The longer such a state of affairs dragged on, the greater became the
contradiction between the needs of economic and cultural development and
the policy of the Government, which had developed its mighty
‘milliard-fold’ inertia. After the epoch of the ‘great patchwork
reforms’ – which not only did not eliminate these contradictions but on
the contrary for the first time vividly revealed them – had been left
behind, it became ever more difficult, and psychologically ever more
impossible, for the Government voluntarily to take the path of
parliamentarism. The only way out of these contradictions which its
situation indicated to society was through the accumulation of
sufficient steam within the boiler of absolutism to burst it.

Thus, the administrative, military and financial power of absolutism,
thanks to which it could exist in spite of social development, not only
did not exclude the possibility of revolution, as was the opinion of the
liberals. but, on the contrary, made revolution the only way out;
furthermore, this revolution was guaranteed in advance an all the more
radical character in proportion as the great might of absolutism dug an
abyss between itself and the nation. Russian Marxism can justly be proud
of having alone explained the direction of this development and foretold
its general forms [3], while the liberals fed themselves on the most
utopian ‘practicalism’ and the revolutionary ‘Narodniki’ lived on
phantasmagoria and a belief in miracles.

The entire preceding social development made revolution inevitable.
What, then, were the forces of this revolution? 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. i.e., a section of pre-capitalist society possessing formally laid
down rights and duties. cf. the ‘third estate’, i.e., those who were
neither nobles nor clergy, in pre-revolutionary France. – _Trans._

2. It is sufficient to recall the characteristic features of the
original relations between the State and the school to realize that the
latter was, at the very least, just as ‘artificial’ product of the State
as the factory was. The educational efforts of the State illustrate this
‘artificiality’. Pupils who played truant were put in chains. The whole
school was in chains. Study was a form of service. Pupils were paid
wages, etc.. etc. – _L.T._

3. Even such a reactionary bureaucrat as Professor Mendeleyev cannot but
admit this. Speaking about the development of industry, he observes:
‘The socialists perceived something here and even partly understood it,
but went astray, following their Latinism [!], recommending resort to
force, pandering to the brutal instincts of the mob and striving toward
revolutions and power.’ (TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING OF RUSSIA, p.120)



II THE TOWNS AND CAPITAL


 

 

Urban Russia is a product of very recent history; more precisely, of the
last few decades. At the end of the reign of Peter I, in the first
quarter of the eighteenth century, the town population numbered somewhat
more than 328,000, i.e., about 3 per cent of the total population of the
country. At the end of the same century, it amounted to 1,301,000, about
4.1 per cent of the total population. By 1812 the urban population had
risen to 1,653,000, which was equivalent to 4.4 per cent of the total.
By the middle of the nineteenth century it was still no more than
3,482,000 – 7.8 per cent of the total. Finally, according to the last
census (1897) the population of the towns numbered 16,289,000, i.e.,
about 13 per cent of the total population. [1]

If we consider the town as a social-economic formation and not merely as
an administrative unit, we must admit that the above figures do not give
a true picture of urban development: the history of the Russian State
shows us numerous instances where charters were granted to or withdrawn
from towns for reasons which were far from scientific. Nevertheless,
these figures do clearly show the insignificance of the towns in
pre-Reform Russia and their feverishly rapid growth during the last
decade. According to the calculations of Mikhailovsky, the increase in
the urban population between 1885 and 1887 was equivalent to 33.8 per
cent, i.e., more than double the increase in the population of Russia as
a whole (15.25 per cent), and nearly three times the increase in the
rural population (12.7 per cent). If we add to this the industrial
villages and hamlets, the rapid growth of the urban (in the sense of
non-agricultural) population appears more clearly still.

But the modern Russian towns differ from the old ones not only in the
number of their inhabitants but also in their social type: they are
centres of commercial and industrial life. The majority of our old towns
played hardly any economic role; they were military and administrative
centres or fortresses, their inhabitants were employed in one or another
form of State service and lived at the expense of the exchequer, and in
general the city was an administrative, military and tax-collecting
centre.

When a non-service population settled within the precincts of the town
or on its outskirts, for protection against enemies, this did not in the
slightest degree interfere with their continuing with their former
agricultural pursuits. Even Moscow, the largest town in old Russia, was,
according to M. Milyukov, simply ‘a royal manor, a considerable portion
of the population of which was connected in one way or another with the
court, either as members of the suite, as guards, or as servants. Out of
over 16,000 households, according to the census of 1701, not more than
7,000, that is, 44 per cent, were settlers and craftsmen, and even these
lived in the State suburb and worked for the palace. The remaining 9,000
belonged to the clergy (1,500) and the ruling estate’. Thus, the Russian
towns, like the towns under the Asiatic despotisms, and in contrast to
the craft and trading towns of the European Middle Ages, played only the
role of _consumers._ In the same period the towns of the West more or
less successfully established the principle that craftsmen had no right
to live in the villages, but the Russian towns never strove after such
aims. Where, then, were manufacturing industry and the crafts? In the
country, attached to agriculture.

The low economic level, with the intense depredations of the State, did
not permit of any accumulation of wealth or social division of labour.
The shorter summer in comparison with the West allowed a longer winter
leisure. Owing to these factors, manufacturing industry was never
separated from agriculture and was not concentrated in the towns, but
remained in the countryside as an occupation auxiliary to agriculture.
When, in the second half of the nineteenth century, capitalist industry
began to develop widely, it did not encounter any urban crafts but, in
the main, only village handicraft. ‘For the one and a half million
factory workers, at the most, that there are in Russia’, writes M.
Milyukov, ‘there are still not less than four million peasants engaged
in domestic manufactures in their own villages, who continue to carry on
at the same time their agricultural occupations. This is the very class
from which ... the European factories arose, but which did not in the
slightest degree participate ... in the setting up of Russia’s
factories.’

Of course, the further growth of the population and of its productivity
created a basis for the social division of labour. This naturally
applied also to the urban crafts. As a result, however, of the economic
pressure of the advanced countries, this basis was seized by large-scale
capitalist industry, so that the town handicrafts had no time to
develop.

The four million rural craftsmen comprised the very element which, in
Europe, formed the nucleus of the town population, entered the guilds as
masters or journeymen, and subsequently found themselves more and more
left outside the guilds. It was precisely the craftsman class that
constituted the bulk of the population in the most revolutionary
quarters of Paris during the Great Revolution. This fact alone – the
insignificance of our urban crafts – had immeasurable consequence for
our revolution. [2]

The essential economic feature of the modern town lies in the fact that
it works up raw materials supplied by the country. For that reason
conditions of transport are decisive for it. Only the introduction of
railways could so greatly widen the sources of supply for the town as to
make it possible to concentrate such large masses of people. The
necessity for concentrating the population arose out of the growth of
large factory industry. The nucleus of the population of a modern town,
at least of a town possessing some economic and political significance,
is the sharply differentiated class of wage-workers. It was this class,
as yet substantially unknown during the period of the Great French
Revolution, that was destined to play the decisive role in our
revolution.

The factory industrial system not only brings the proletariat to the
forefront but also cuts the ground from under the feet of bourgeois
democracy. In previous revolutions the latter found its support in the
urban petty-bourgeoisie: craftsmen, small shopkeepers, etc.

Another reason for the disproportionately large political role played by
the Russian proletariat is the fact that Russian capital is to a
considerable extent of foreign origin. This fact, according to Kautsky,
resulted in the growth of the number, strength and influence of the
proletariat being out of proportion to the growth of bourgeois
liberalism.

As we have said above, capitalism in Russia did not develop out of the
handicraft system. It conquered Russia with the economic culture of the
whole of Europe behind it, and before it, as its immediate competitor,
the helpless village craftsman or the wretched town craftsman, and it
had the half-beggared peasantry as a reservoir of labour-power.
Absolutism assisted in various ways in fettering the country with the
shackles of capitalism.

In the first place it converted the Russian peasant into a tributary of
the Stock Exchanges of the world. The absence of capital within the
country and the government’s constant need for money created a field for
usurious foreign loans. From the reign of Catharine II to the ministry
of Witte and Durnovo, the Amsterdam, London, Berlin and Paris bankers
systematically strove to convert the autocracy into a colossal
Stock-Exchange speculation. A considerable part of the so-called
internal loans, i.e., loans realized through the home credit
departments, were in no way distinguished from foreign loans, because
they were in reality placed with foreign capitalists. Proletarianising
and pauperising the peasantry by heavy taxation, absolutism converted
the millions of the European Stock Exchange into soldiers and
battleships, into prisons and into railways. The greater part of this
expenditure was, from the economic point of view, absolutely
non-productive. An enormous share of the national product was sent
abroad in the form of interest, and enriched and strengthened the
financial aristocracy of Europe. The European financial bourgeoisie,
whose political influence in parliamentary countries during the last ten
years has grown uninterruptedly and has forced the commercial and
industrial capitalists into the background, converted, it is true, the
Tsarist Government into its vassal; but it could not and did not desire
to become a component part of the bourgeois opposition within Russia. It
was guided in its sympathies and antipathies by the principles
formulated by the Dutch bankers Hoppe and Co., in the conditions for the
loan to Tsar Paul in 1798: ‘interest must be paid _irrespective of
political circumstances_’. The European Stock Exchange was even directly
interested in the maintenance of absolutism, for no other government
could guarantee such usurious interest. State loans, however, were not
the only means whereby European capital was imported into Russia. The
very money, payment of which absorbed a good part of the Russian State
budget, returned to the territory of Russia in the form of
commercial-industrial capital attracted by the untouched natural wealth
of the country, and especially by the unorganized labour-power, which so
far had not been accustomed to put up any resistance. The latter period
of our industrial boom of 1893-99 was also a period of intensified
immigration of European capital. Thus it was capital which, as before,
remained largely European and which realized its political power in the
parliaments of France and Belgium, that mobilised the working class in
Russia.

By economically enslaving this backward country, European capital
projected its main branches of production and methods of communication
across a whole series of intermediate technical and economic stages
through which it had to pass in its countries of origin. But the fewer
obstacles it met with in the path of its _economic_ domination, the more
insignificant proved to be its political role.

The European bourgeoisie developed out of the Third Estate of the Middle
Ages. It raised the standard of protest against the pillage and violence
carried on by the first two estates, in the name of the interests of the
people which it itself desired to exploit. The estates-monarchy of the
Middle Ages, in its process of conversion into bureaucratic absolutism,
relied on the population of the towns in its struggle against the
pretensions of the clergy and the nobility. The bourgeoisie made use of
this for its own political elevation. Thus, bureaucratic absolutism and
the capitalist class developed simultaneously, and when these two came
into conflict, in 1789, the bourgeoisie proved to have the whole nation
behind it.

Russian absolutism developed under the direct pressure of the Western
states. It copied their methods of government and administration much
earlier than economic conditions here permitted the rise of a capitalist
bourgeoisie. It already disposed of a tremendous standing army and a
centralised, bureaucratic and fiscal machine, and had entered into
irredeemable debt to the European bankers, at a time when the Russian
towns still played an absolutely insignificant economic role.

Capital intruded from the West with the direct co-operation of
absolutism, and in a short period converted a number of old archaic
towns into centres of trade and industry, and even created, in a short
time, commercial and industrial towns in places that previously had been
absolutely uninhabited. This capital frequently appeared in the form of
large impersonal shareholding companies. During the ten years of the
industrial booms of 1893-1902 the total share capital increased by two
milliard roubles, whereas during 1854-92 it had increased by only 900
millions. The proletariat immediately found itself concentrated in
tremendous masses, while between these masses and the autocracy there
stood a capitalist bourgeoisie, very small in numbers, isolated from the
‘people’, half-foreign, without historical traditions, and inspired only
by the greed for gain. 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. The figures are taken from Milyukov’s ESSAYS. The urban population of
_all_ Russia, including Siberia and Finland, was given by the 1897
census as 17,122,000 or 13.25 per cent of the total. (Mendeleyev,
TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING OF RUSSIA, St. Petersburg 1906, 2 vols., table
on p.90)

2. At a time when uncritical comparison between the Russian revolution
and the French revolution of 1789 had become commonplace, Parvus very
sagaciously pointed out this fact as being responsible for the
particular destiny of the Russian revolution. – _L.T._



III 1789 – 1848 – 1905


 

 

History does not repeat itself. However much one may compare the Russian
Revolution with the Great French Revolution, the former can never be
transformed into a repetition of the latter. The 19th century has not
passed in vain.

The year 1848 already differs tremendously from 1789. In comparison with
the Great Revolution, the Prussian and Austrian Revolutions surprise one
with their insignificant sweep. In one way they took place too early and
in another too late. That gigantic exertion of strength which is
necessary for bourgeois society to settle radically with the lords of
the past can only be attained _either by the power of a unanimous
nation_ rising against feudal despotism, or by the mighty development of
the _class struggle_ within this nation striving to emancipate itself.
In the first case, which was what happened in 1789-93, the national
energy, compressed by the fierce resistance of the old order, was wholly
expended in the struggle against reaction; in the second case, which has
never yet occurred in history, and which we are considering merely as a
possibility, the actual energy necessary for overcoming the dark forces
of history is generated within the bourgeoisie nation by means of an
‘internecine’ class war. The severe internal friction, absorbing a great
deal of energy and depriving the bourgeoisie of the possibility of
playing the chief role, urges its antagonist the proletariat to the
forefront, gives the proletariat ten years’ experience in a month,
places it at the head of affairs, and hands it the tightly-drawn reins
of power. This class, determined, knowing no doubts, imparts a mighty
sweep to events.

Revolution can be achieved either by a nation gathering itself together
like a lion preparing to spring, or by a nation in the process of
struggle becoming conclusively divided in order to free the best part of
itself for the execution of those tasks which the nation as a whole is
unable to carry out. These are two opposite sets of historical
conditions, which in their pure form are, of course, possible only in
logical contraposition.

A middle course in this, as in so many cases, is worst of all, but it
was this middle course that developed in 1848.

In the heroic period of French history we saw a bourgeoisie,
enlightened, active, as yet not aware of the contradictions of its own
position, upon whom history had imposed the task of leadership in the
struggle for a new order, not only against the outworn institutions of
France but also against the reactionary forces of the whole of Europe.
The bourgeoisie, consistently, in all its factions, regarded itself as
the leader of the nation, rallied the masses to the struggle, gave them
slogans and dictated their fighting tactics. Democracy bound the nation
together with a political ideology. The people – urban petty-bourgeois,
peasants and workers – elected bourgeois as their deputies, and the
instructions given these deputies by their constituents were written in
the language of a bourgeoisie coming to awareness of its messianic
mission. During the revolution itself, though class antagonisms were
revealed, yet the powerful inertia of the revolutionary struggle
consistently threw the more conservative elements of the bourgeoisie off
the political path. No stratum was thrown off before it had transferred
its energy to the stratum behind it. The nation as a whole continued
therefore to struggle for its aims with sharper and more determined
methods. When the upper layers of the rich bourgeoisie, breaking away
from the national core which had entered into the movement, formed an
alliance with Louis XVI, the democratic demands of the nation were
directed _against_ this bourgeoisie, and this led to universal suffrage
and the republic, as the logical, inevitable form of democracy.

The Great French Revolution was indeed a national revolution. And what
is more, within the national framework, the world struggle of the
bourgeoisie for domination, for power, and for undivided triumph found
its classical expression.

_Jacobinism_ is now a term of reproach on the lips of all liberal
wiseacres. Bourgeois hatred of revolution, its hatred towards the
masses, hatred of the force and grandeur of the history that is made in
the streets, is concentrated in one cry of indignation and fear –
_Jacobinism_! We, the world army of Communism, have long ago made our
historical reckoning with Jacobinism. The whole of the present
international proletarian movement was formed and grew strong in the
struggle against the traditions of Jacobinism. We subjected its theories
to criticism, we exposed its historical limitations, its social
contradictoriness, its utopianism, we exposed its phraseology, and broke
with its traditions, which for decades had been regarded as the sacred
heritage of the revolution.

But we defend Jacobinism against the attacks, the calumny, and the
stupid vituperations of anaemic, phlegmatic liberalism. The bourgeoisie
has shamefully betrayed all the traditions of its historical youth, and
its present hirelings dishonour the graves of its ancestors and scoff at
the ashes of their ideals. The proletariat has taken the honour of the
revolutionary past of the bourgeoisie under its protection. The
proletariat, however radically it may have, in practice, broken with the
revolutionary traditions of the bourgeoisie, nevertheless preserves
them, as a sacred heritage of great passions, heroism and initiative,
and its heart beats in sympathy with the speeches and acts of the
Jacobin Convention.

What gave liberalism its charm if not the traditions of the Great French
Revolution? At what other period did bourgeois democracy rise to such a
height and kindle such a great flame in the hearts of the people as
during the period of the Jacobin, _sansculotte_, terrorist,
Robespierrian democracy of 1793?

What else but Jacobinism made and still makes it possible for French
bourgeois-radicalism of various shades to keep the overwhelming majority
of the people and even the proletariat under its influence at a time
when bourgeois radicalism in Germany and Austria has closed its brief
history in deeds of pettiness and shame?

What is it if not the charm of Jacobinism, with its abstract political
ideology, its cult of the Sacred Republic, its triumphant declarations,
that even now nourishes French radicals and radical-socialists like
Clemenceau, Millerand, Briand and Bourgeois, and all those politicians
who know how to defend the mainstays of bourgeois society no worse than
the dull-witted Junkers of Wilhelm II By the Grace of God? They are
envied hopelessly by the bourgeois democrats of other countries; and yet
they shower calumnies upon the source of their political advantage –
heroic Jacobinism.

Even after many hopes had been destroyed, Jacobinism remained in the
memory of the people as a tradition. For a long time the proletariat
spoke of its future in the language of the past. In 1840, almost half a
century after the government of the ‘Mountain’, eight years before the
June days of 1848, Heine visited several workshops in the _faubourg_ of
Saint-Marceau and saw what the workers, ‘the soundest section of the
lower classes’, were reading. ‘I found there’, he wrote to a German
newspaper, ‘several new speeches by old Robespierre and also pamphlets
by Marat issued in two-sous editions; Cabet’s HISTORY OF THE REVOLUTION;
the malignant lampoons of Carmenen; the works of Buonarroti, THE
TEACHINGS AND CONSPIRACY OF BABEUF, all productions reeking with blood
... As one of the fruits of this seed,’ prophesies the poet, ‘sooner or
later a republic will threaten to spring up in France.’

In 1848 the bourgeoisie was already unable to play a comparable role. It
did not want and was not able to undertake the revolutionary liquidation
of the social system that stood in its path to power. We know now _why_
that was so. Its aim was – and of this it was perfectly conscious – to
introduce into the old system the necessary guarantees, not for its
political domination, but merely for a sharing of power with the forces
of the past. It was meanly wise through the experience of the French
bourgeoisie, corrupted by its treachery and frightened by its failures.
It not only failed to lead the masses in storming the old order, but
placed its back against this order so as to repulse the masses who were
pressing it forward.

The French bourgeoisie succeeded in bringing off its Great Revolution.
Its consciousness was the consciousness of society and nothing could
become established as an institution without first passing through its
consciousness as an aim, as a problem of political creation. It often
resorted to theatrical poses in order to hide from itself the
limitations of its own bourgeois world – but it marched forward.

The German bourgeoisie, however, from the very start, did not ‘make’ the
revolution, but dissociated itself from it. Its consciousness rose
against the objective conditions for its own domination. The revolution
could only be carried out not by it but against it. Democratic
institutions represented to its mind not an aim to fight for but a
menace to its welfare.

In 1848 a class was needed that would be able to take charge of events
without and in spite of the bourgeoisie, a class which would not only be
prepared to push the bourgeois forward by its pressure but also at the
decisive moment to throw its political corpse out of the way. Neither
the urban petty-bourgeoisie nor the peasants were able to do this.

The _urban petty bourgeoisie_ was hostile not only to yesterday but also
to the morrow. Still enmeshed in mediaeval relations, but already unable
to stand against ‘free’ industry, still setting its imprint on the
towns, but already giving way before the middle and big bourgeoisie,
steeped in prejudice, deafened by the noise of events, exploited and
exploiting, greedy and helpless in its greed, the petty bourgeoisie,
left stranded, could not control the tremendous events of the day.

The _peasantry_ was to an even larger extent deprived of independent
political initiative. Shackled for centuries, poverty-stricken, furious,
uniting in itself all the threads of the old exploitation and the new,
the peasantry at a certain moment constituted a rich source of
revolutionary strength; but, unorganized, scattered, isolated from the
towns, the nerve centres of politics and culture, stupid, limited in
their horizons to the confines of their respective villages, indifferent
to everything that the town was thinking, the peasants could not have
any significance as a leading force. The peasantry was pacified
immediately its back had been relieved of the burden of feudal
obligations, and repaid the towns, which had fought for its rights, with
black ingratitude. The emancipated peasants became the fanatics of
‘order’.

The _intellectual democrats_ lacked class power. One moment this group
followed its elder sister, the liberal bourgeoisie, as a sort of
political tail, at another it abandoned the liberal bourgeoisie at the
critical instant in order to expose its own weakness. It confused itself
in unsolved contradictions and carried this confusion around with it
everywhere.

The _proletariat_ was too weak, lacked organization, experience and
knowledge. Capitalism had developed sufficiently to render necessary the
abolition of the old feudal relations, but not sufficiently to bring
forward the working class, the product of the new industrial relations,
as a decisive political force. The antagonism between the proletariat
and the bourgeoisie, even within the national framework of Germany, had
gone too far to allow the bourgeoisie fearlessly to take up the role of
national hegemon, but not sufficiently to allow the working class to
take up that role. The internal friction of the revolution, it is true,
prepared the proletariat for political independence, but at the time it
weakened energy and unity of action, caused a fruitless expenditure of
effort, and compelled the revolution, after its first successes, to mark
time tediously and then, under the blows of reaction, to retreat.

Austria provided a particularly clear and tragic example of this
unfinished and incomplete character of political relations in the period
of revolution.

The _Viennese proletariat_ in 1848 exhibited wonderful heroism and
inexhaustible energy. Again and again it rushed into battle, urged on
only by a hazy class instinct, lacking a general conception of the aims
of the struggle, and passing gropingly from one slogan to another. The
leadership of the proletariat, remarkably enough, passed into the hands
of the _students_, the only active _democratic group_ which, owing to
its activity, had a great influence on the masses, and for that reason
also upon events. The students undoubtedly could fight bravely on the
barricades and fraternise honourably with the workers, but they were
totally unable to direct the progress of the revolution which had handed
them the ‘dictatorship’ of the street.

The proletariat, unorganized, without political experience and
independent leadership, followed the students. At every critical moment
the workers invariably offered the ‘gentlemen who worked with their
heads’ the assistance of ‘those who worked with their hands’. The
students at one moment summoned the workers to battle and at another
moment themselves barred their way from the suburbs into the city.
Sometimes, using their political authority and relying upon the arms of
the Academic Legion, they forbade the workers to put forward their own
independent demands. This was a classically clear form of benevolent
revolutionary dictatorship _over_ the proletariat. What was the outcome
of these social relations? Why, this: when, on 26th May, all the workers
of Vienna, at the call of the students, rose to their feet in order to
resist the disarming of the students (the Academic Legion), when the
whole of the population of the capital, covering the entire town with
barricades, showed remarkable power and took possession of Vienna, when
all Austria was rallying to armed Vienna, when the monarchy was in
flight and had lost all importance, when as a result of the pressure of
the people the last of the troops had been withdrawn from the capital,
when the government of Austria resigned without nominating a successor –
there was no political force found to take the helm.

The _liberal bourgeoisie_ deliberately refused to take the power secured
in such brigand-like fashion; it only dreamed of the return of the
Emperor who had fled to the Tyrol.

The _workers_ were sufficiently brave to beat the reaction, but were not
sufficiently organized and conscious to occupy its place. A powerful
labour movement existed, but proletarian class struggle with a definite
political aim had not yet been sufficiently developed. The proletariat,
incapable of taking the helm, could not accomplish this great historical
task and the bourgeois democrats, as often happens, sneaked away at the
moment of greatest urgency.

To compel these deserters to fulfil their obligations would have
required on the part of the proletariat not less energy and maturity
than would have been necessary for the setting up of a provisional
workers’ government.

Altogether, a position was created concerning which a contemporary
accurately said: ‘A Republic had actually been set up in Vienna, but
unfortunately no one saw this.’ The Republic that nobody noticed
departed for a long time from the stage, giving place to the Habsburgs
... An opportunity, once missed, never returns.

From the experience of the Hungarian and German revolutions Lassalle
drew the conclusion that from now on revolutions could only find support
in the class struggle of the proletariat. In a letter to Marx dated 24th
October, 1849, Lassalle writes: ‘Hungary had more chances than any other
country of bringing its struggle to a successful outcome. Among other
reasons this was because the party there was not in a state of division
and sharp antagonism as it was in Western Europe; because the
revolution, to a high degree, had taken the form of a struggle for
national independence. Nevertheless, Hungary was defeated, and precisely
as a consequence of the treachery of the _national_ party.’

‘This, and the history of Germany during 1848-49,’ continues Lassalle,
‘brings me to the conclusion that no revolution can be successful in
Europe, unless it is from the very first proclaimed to be purely
socialistic. No struggle can be successful if social questions enter
into it only as a sort of hazy element, and remain in the background,
and if it is carried on under the banner of national regeneration or
bourgeois republicanism.’

We shall not stop to criticise these very decided conclusions. It is
undoubtedly true, however, that already in the middle of the nineteenth
century the problem of political emancipation could not be solved by the
unanimous and concerted tactics of the pressure of the whole nation.
Only the independent tactics of the proletariat, gathering strength for
the struggle from its class position, and only from its class position,
could have secured victory for the revolution.

The Russian working class of 1906 in no way resembles the workers of
Vienna of 1848. The best evidence of this is the springing up all over
Russia of the Soviets of Workers’ Deputies. These were not
previously-prepared conspirative organizations for the purpose of
seizure of power by the workers at the moment of revolt. No, these were
organs created in a planned way by the masses themselves for the purpose
of co-ordinating their revolutionary struggle. And these Soviets,
elected by the masses and responsible to the masses, are unquestionably
democratic institutions, conducting a most determined class policy in
the spirit of revolutionary socialism.

The social peculiarities of the Russian revolution are particularly
evident in the question of the arming of the nation. A militia, the
National Guard, was the first demand and the first gain of every
revolution, in 1789 and in 1848, in Paris, in all the states of Italy,
in Vienna and in Berlin. In 1848 the National Guard, i.e., the arming of
the propertied and the ‘educated’ classes, was the demand of the whole
of the bourgeois opposition, even of the most moderate, and its object
was not only to safeguard the liberties won, or rather, subject to
‘conferment’, against reversals from above, but also to protect
bourgeois private property from attacks by the proletariat. Thus the
demand for a militia was clearly a class demand of the bourgeoisie. ‘The
Italians very well understood’, says the English liberal historian of
united Italy, ‘that an armed civil militia would make the further
existence of despotism impossible. Besides this it was a guarantee for
the propertied classes against possible anarchy and any sort of disorder
from below.’ [1] And the ruling reaction, not having a sufficient number
of troops in the centre of operations to deal with ‘anarchy’, that is
with the revolutionary masses, armed the bourgeoisie. Absolutism first
allowed the burghers to suppress and pacify the workers and then it
disarmed and pacified the burghers.

In Russia the demand for a militia found no support in the bourgeois
parties. The liberals cannot help understanding the serious significance
of arms; absolutism has given them some object-lessons in this respect.
But they also understand the absolute impossibility of creating a
militia in Russia apart from or against the proletariat. The Russian
workers do not resemble the workers of 1848 who filled their pockets
with stones and armed themselves with picks while the shopkeepers,
students and lawyers had royal muskets on their shoulders and swords at
their sides.

Arming the revolution, in Russia, means first and foremost arming the
workers. Knowing and fearing this, the liberals altogether eschew a
militia. They even surrender their position to absolutism without a
fight just as the bourgeois Thiers surrendered Paris and France to
Bismarck simply to avoid arming the workers.

In that manifesto of the liberal-democratic coalition, the symposium
called THE CONSTITUTIONAL STATE, Mr. Dzhivelegov, discussing the
possibility of revolutions, quite rightly says that ‘Society itself, at
the necessary moment, must be prepared to stand up in defence of its
Constitution’. But as the logical conclusion from this is the demand for
the arming of the people, this liberal philosopher finds it ‘necessary
to add’ that ‘it is not at all necessary for everyone to bear arms’ [2]
in order to prevent reversals. It is only necessary that society itself
shall be prepared to offer resistance – in what manner is not indicated.
If any conclusion at all can be drawn from this, it is that in the
hearts of our democrats the fear of the armed proletariat is greater
than the fear of the soldiery of the autocracy.

For that reason the task of arming the revolution falls with all its
weight upon the proletariat. The civil militia, the class demand of the
bourgeoisie in 1848 is, in Russia, from the very first a demand for the
arming of the people and above all for the arming of the proletariat.
The fate of the Russian Revolution is bound up with this question.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Bolton King, HISTORY OF ITALIAN UNITY, Russ. trans., Moscow 1901,
vol.1, p.220. – _L.T._

2. THE CONSTITUTIONAL STATE, a symposium, 1st edition, p.49. – _L.T._



IV REVOLUTION AND THE PROLETARIAT


 

 

Revolution is an open measurement of strength between social forces in a
struggle for power. The State is not an end in itself. It is only a
machine in the hands of the dominating social forces. Like every machine
it has its motor, transmitting and executive mechanism. The driving
force of the State is class interest; its motor mechanism is agitation,
the press, church and school propaganda, parties, street meetings,
petitions and revolts. The transmitting mechanism is the legislative
organization of caste, dynastic, estate or class interests represented
as the will of God (absolutism) or the will of the nation
(parliamentarism). Finally, the executive mechanism is the
administration, with its police, the courts, with their prisons, and the
army.

The State is not an end in itself, but is a tremendous means for
organizing, disorganizing and reorganizing social relations. It can be a
powerful lever for revolution or a tool for organized stagnation,
depending on the hands that control it.

Every political party worthy of the name strives to capture political
power and thus place the State at the service of the class whose
interests it expresses. The Social-Democrats, being the party of the
proletariat, naturally strive for the political domination of the
working class.

The proletariat grows and becomes stronger with the growth of
capitalism. In this sense the development of capitalism is also the
development of the proletariat towards dictatorship. But the day and the
hour when power will pass into the hands of the working class depends
directly not upon the level attained by the productive forces but upon
relations in the class struggle, upon the international situation, and,
finally, upon a number of subjective factors: the traditions, the
initiative and the readiness to fight of the workers.

It is possible for the workers to come to power in an economically
backward country sooner than in an advanced country. In 1871 the workers
deliberately took power in their hands in petty-bourgeois Paris – true,
for only two months, but in the big-capitalist centres of Britain or the
United States the workers have never held power for so much as an hour.
To imagine that the dictatorship of the proletariat is in some way
automatically dependent on the technical development and resources of a
country is a prejudice of ‘economic’ materialism simplified to
absurdity. This point of view has nothing in common with Marxism.

In our view, the Russian revolution will create conditions in which
power can pass into the hands of the workers – and in the event of the
victory of the revolution it must do so – _before_ the politicians of
bourgeois liberalism get the chance to display to the full their talent
for governing.

Summing up the revolution and counter-revolution of 1848-49 in the
American newspaper THE TRIBUNE, Marx wrote:

‘The working class in Germany is, in its social and political
development, as far behind that of England and France as the German
bourgeoisie is behind the bourgeoisie of those countries. Like master,
like man. The evolution of the conditions of existence for a numerous,
strong, concentrated and intelligent proletarian class goes hand in hand
with the development of the conditions of existence for a numerous,
wealthy, concentrated and powerful middle class. The working-class
movement itself never is independent, never is of an exclusively
proletarian character until all the different factions of the middle
class, and particularly its most progressive faction, the large
manufacturers, have conquered political power, and remodeled the State
according to their wants. It is then that the inevitable conflict
between the employer and the employed becomes imminent, and cannot be
adjourned any longer ...’ [1]

This quotation is probably familiar to the reader, for it has been
considerably abused by the textual Marxists in recent times. It has been
brought forward as an irrefutable argument against the idea of a working
class government in Russia. ‘Like master, like man.’ If the capitalist
bourgeoisie is not strong enough to take power, they argue, then it is
still less possible to establish a workers’ democracy, i.e., the
political domination of the proletariat.

Marxism is above all a method of analysis – not analysis of texts, but
analysis of social relations. Is it true that, in Russia, the weakness
of capitalist liberalism inevitably means the weakness of the labour
movement? Is it true, for Russia, that there cannot be an independent
labour movement until the bourgeoisie has conquered power? It is
sufficient merely to put these questions to see what a hopeless
formalism lies concealed beneath the attempt to convert an
historically-relative remark of Marx’s into a supra-historical axiom.

During the period of the industrial boom, the development of factory
industry in Russia bore an ‘American’ character; but in its actual
dimensions capitalist industry in Russia is an infant compared with the
industry of the United States. Five million persons – 16.6 per cent of
the economically occupied population – are engaged in manufacturing
industry in Russia; for the USA the corresponding figures would be six
million and 22.2 per cent. These figures still tell us comparatively
little, but they become eloquent if we recall that the population of
Russia is nearly twice that of the USA. But in order to appreciate the
actual dimensions of Russian and American industry it should be observed
that in 1900 the American factories and large workshops turned out goods
for sale to the amount of 25 milliard roubles, while in the same period
the Russian factories turned out goods to the value of less than two and
a half milliard roubles. [2]

There is no doubt that the numbers, the concentration, the culture and
the political importance of the industrial proletariat depend on the
extent to which capitalist industry is developed. But this dependence is
not direct. Between the productive forces of a country and the political
strength of its classes there cut across at any given moment various
social and political factors of a national and international character,
and these displace and even sometimes completely alter the political
expression of economic relations. In spite of the fact that the
productive forces of the United States are ten times as great as those
of Russia, nevertheless the political role of the Russian proletariat,
its influence on the politics of its own country and the possibility of
its influencing the politics of the world in the near future are
incomparably greater than in the case of the proletariat of the United
States.

Kautsky, in his recent book on the American proletariat, points out that
there is no direct relation between the political power of the
proletariat and the bourgeoisie, on the one hand, and the level of
capitalist development on the other. ‘Two states exist’ he says,
‘diametrically contrasted one with the other. In one of them there is
developed inordinately, i.e., out of proportion to the level of the
development of the capitalist mode of production, one of the elements of
the latter, and in the other, another of these elements. In one state –
America – it is the capitalist class, while in Russia it is the
proletariat. In no other country than America is there so much basis for
speaking of the dictatorship of capital, while the militant proletariat
has nowhere acquired such importance as in Russia. This importance must
and undoubtedly will increase, because this country only recently began
to take a part in the modern class struggle, and has only recently
provided a certain amount of elbow room for it.’ Pointing out that
Germany, to a certain extent, may learn its future from Russia, Kautsky
continues: ‘It is indeed most extraordinary that the Russian proletariat
should be showing us our future, in so far as this is expressed not in
the extent of the development of capital, but in the protest of the
working class. The fact that this Russia is the most backward of the
large states of the capitalist world would appear’, observes Kautsky,
‘to contradict the materialist conception of history, according to which
economic development is the basis of political development; but really’,
he goes on to say, ‘this only contradicts the materialist conception of
history as it is depicted by our opponents and critics, who regard it
not as a _method of investigation_ but merely as a ready-made
_stereotype_.’ [3] We particularly recommend these lines to our Russian
Marxists, who replace independent analysis of social relations by
deductions from texts, selected to serve every occasion in life. Nobody
compromises Marxism so much as these self-styled Marxists.

Thus, according to Kautsky, Russia stands on an economically low level
of capitalist development, politically it has an insignificant
capitalist bourgeoisie and a powerful revolutionary proletariat. This
results in the fact that ‘struggle for the interests of _all_ Russia has
fallen to the lot of the _only now-existing strong class in the country_
– the industrial proletariat. For this reason the industrial proletariat
has tremendous political importance, and for this reason the struggle
for the emancipation of Russia from the incubus of absolutism which is
stifling it has become converted into a _single combat between
absolutism and the industrial proletariat_, a single combat in which the
peasants may render considerable support but cannot play a leading role.

Does not all this give us reason to conclude that the Russian ‘man’ will
take power sooner than his ‘master’?

There can be two forms of political optimism. We can exaggerate our
strength and advantages in a revolutionary situation and undertake tasks
which are not justified by the given correlation of forces. On the other
hand, we may optimistically set a limit to our revolutionary tasks –
beyond which, however, we shall inevitably be driven by the logic of our
position.

It is possible to limit the scope of all the questions of the revolution
by asserting that our revolution is _bourgeois_ in its objective aims
and therefore in its inevitable results, closing our eyes to the fact
that the chief actor in this bourgeois revolution is the proletariat,
which is being impelled towards power by the entire course of the
revolution.

We may reassure ourselves that in the framework of a bourgeois
revolution the political domination of the proletariat will only be a
passing episode, forgetting that once the proletariat has taken power in
its hands it will not give it up without a desperate resistance, until
it is torn from its hands by armed force.

We may reassure ourselves that the social conditions of Russia are still
not ripe for a socialist economy, without considering that the
proletariat, on taking power, must, by the very logic of its position,
inevitably be urged toward the introduction of state management of
industry. The general sociological term _bourgeois revolution_ by no
means solves the politico-tactical problems, contradictions and
difficulties which the mechanics of a _given_ bourgeois revolution throw
up.

Within the framework of the bourgeois revolution at the end of the
eighteenth century, the objective task of which was to establish the
domination of capital, the dictatorship of the _sansculottes_ was found
to be possible. This dictatorship was not simply a passing episode, it
left its impress upon the entire ensuing century, and this in spite of
the fact that it was very quickly shattered against the enclosing
barriers of the bourgeois revolution. In the revolution at the beginning
of the twentieth century, the direct objective tasks of which are also
bourgeois, there emerges as a near prospect the inevitable, or at least
the probable, political domination of the proletariat. The proletariat
itself will see to it that this domination does not become a mere
passing ‘episode’, as some realist philistines hope. But we can even now
ask ourselves: is it inevitable that the proletarian dictatorship should
be shattered against the barriers of the bourgeois revolution, or is it
possible that in the given _world-historical_ conditions, it may
discover before it the prospect of victory on breaking through these
barriers? Here we are confronted by questions of tactics: should we
consciously work towards a working-class government in proportion as the
development of the revolution brings this stage nearer, or must we at
that moment regard political power as a misfortune which the bourgeois
revolution is ready to thrust upon the workers, and which it would be
better to avoid?

Ought we to apply to ourselves the words of the ‘realist’ politician
Vollmar in connection with the Communards of 1871: ‘Instead of taking
power they would have done better to go to sleep’ ...?

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Marx, GERMANY IN 1848-50, Russ. trans., Alexeyeva edition, 1905,
pp.8-9. – _L.T._ [i.e. GERMANY: REVOLUTION AND COUNTER-REVOLUTION, Ch.1;
SELECTED WORKS OF KARL MARX, 1942 edition, Vol.II, p.46.]

2. D. Mendeleyev, TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING OF RUSSIA, 1906, p.99. –
_L.T._

3. K. Kautsky, AMERICAN AND RUSSIAN WORKERS, Russian translation, St.
Petersburg 1906, pp.4 and 5. – _L.T._



V THE PROLETARIAT IN POWER AND THE PEASANTRY


 

 

In the event of a decisive victory of the revolution, power will pass
into the hands of that class which plays a leading role in the struggle
– in other words, into the hands of the proletariat. Let us say at once
that this by no means precludes revolutionary representatives of
non-proletarian social groups entering the government. They can and
should be in the government: a sound policy will compel the proletariat
to call to power the influential leaders of the urban petty-bourgeoisie,
of the intellectuals and of the peasantry. The whole problem consists in
this: _who will determine the content of the government’s policy, who
will form within it a solid majority?_

It is one thing when representatives of the democratic strata of the
people enter a government with a workers’ majority, but it is quite
another thing when representatives of the proletariat participate in a
definitely bourgeois-democratic government in the capacity of more or
less honoured hostages.

The policy of the liberal capitalist bourgeoisie, in all its waverings,
retreats and treacheries, is quite definite. The policy of the
proletariat is even more definite and finished. But the policy of the
intellectuals, owing to their socially intermediate character and their
political elasticity; the policy of the peasantry, in view of their
social diversity, ther intermediate position and their primitiveness;
the policy of the urban petty-bourgeoisie, once again owing to its lack
of character, its intermediate position and its complete lack of
political tradition – the policy of these three social groups is utterly
indefinite, unformed, full of possibilities and therefore full of
surprises.

It is sufficient to try to imagine a revolutionary democratic government
without representatives of the proletariat to see immediately the
senselessness of such a conception. The refusal of the social-democrats
to participate in a revolutionary government would render such a
government quite impossible and would thus be equivalent to a betrayal
of the revolution. But the participation of the proletariat in a
government is also objectively most probable, and permissible in
principle, only as a _dominating and leading participation_. One may, of
course, describe such a government as the dictatorship of the
proletariat and peasantry, a dictatorship of the proletariat, peasantry
and intelligentsia, or even a coalition government of the working class
and the petty-bourgeoisie, but the question nevertheless remains: who is
to wield the hegemony in the government itself, and through it in the
country? And when we speak of a workers’ government, by this we reply
that the hegemony should belong to the working class.

The National Convention, as an organ of the Jacobin dictatorship, was by
no means composed of Jacobins alone. More than that – the Jacobins were
in a minority in it; but the influence of the _sansculottes_ outside the
walls of the Convention, and the need for a determined policy in order
to save the country, gave power into the hands of the Jacobins. Thus,
while the Convention was _formally_ a national representation,
consisting of Jacobins, Girondists and the vast wavering Centre known as
the ‘marsh’, _in essence_ it was a dictatorship of the Jacobins.

When we speak of a workers’ government we have in view a government in
which the working-class representatives dominate and lead. The
proletariat, in order to consolidate its power, cannot but widen the
base of the revolution. Many sections of the working masses,
particularly in the countryside, will be drawn into the revolution and
become politically organized only after the advance-guard of the
revolution, the urban proletariat, stands at the helm of state.
Revolutionary agitation and organization will then be conducted with the
help of state resources. The legislative power itself will become a
powerful instrument for revolutionizing the masses. The nature of our
social-historical relations, which lays the whole burden of the
bourgeois revolution upon the shoulders of the proletariat, will not
only create tremendous difficulties for the workers’ government but, in
the first period of its existence at any rate, will also give it
invaluable advantages. This will affect the relations between the
proletariat and the peasantry.

In the revolutions of 1789-93 and 1848 power first of all passed from
absolutism to the moderate elements of the bourgeoisie, and it was the
latter class which emancipated the peasantry (_how_, is another matter)
before revolutionary democracy received or was even preparing to receive
power. The emancipated peasantry lost all interest in the political
stunts of the ‘townspeople’, that is, in the further progress of the
revolution, and placing itself like a heavy foundation-stone at the foot
of ‘order’, betrayed the revolution to the Caesarist or
_ancien-regime_-absolutist reaction.

The Russian revolution does not, and for a long time will not, permit
the establishment of any kind of bourgeois-constitutional order that
might solve the most elementary problems of democracy. All the
‘enlightened’ efforts of reformer-bureaucrats like Witte and Stolypin
are nullified by their own struggle for existence. Consequently, the
fate of the most elementary revolutionary interests of the peasantry –
even the peasantry _as a whole_, as an _estate_, is bound up with the
fate of entire revolution, i.e., with the fate of the proletariat.

_The proletariat in power will stand before the peasants as the class
which has emancipated it_. The domination of the proletariat will mean
not only democratic equality, free self-government, the transference of
the whole burden of taxation to the rich classes, the dissolution of the
standing army in the armed people and the abolition of compulsory church
imposts, but also recognition of all revolutionary changes
(expropriations) in land relationships carried out by the peasants. The
proletariat will make these changes the starting-point for further state
measures in agriculture. Under such conditions the Russian peasantry in
the first and most difficult period of the revolution will be interested
in the maintenance of a proletarian regime (workers’ democracy) at all
events not less than was the French peasantry in the maintenance of the
military regime of Napoleon Bonaparte, which guaranteed to the new
property-owners, by the force of its bayonets, the inviolability of
their holdings. And this means that the representative body of the
nation, convened under the leadership of the proletariat, which has
secured the support of the peasantry, will be nothing else than a
democratic dress for the rule of the proletariat.

But is it not possible that the peasantry may push the proletariat aside
and take its place? This is impossible. All historical experience
protests against this assumption. Historical experience shows that the
peasantry are absolutely incapable of taking up an _independent_
political role. [1]

The history of capitalism is the history of the subordination of the
country to the town. The industrial development of the European towns in
due course rendered the further existence of feudal relations in
agriculture impossible. But the countryside itself never produced a
class which could undertake the revolutionary task of abolishing
feudalism. The town, which subordinated agriculture to capital, produced
a revolutionary force which took political hegemony over the countryside
into its hands and spread revolution in state and property relations
into the countryside. As further development has proceeded, the country
has finally fallen into economic enslavement to capital, and the
peasantry into political enslavement to the capitalist parties. These
parties have revived feudalism in parliamentary politics, converting the
peasantry into a domain for their electoral hunting expeditions. The
modern bourgeois state, by means of taxation and militarism, throws the
peasant into the clutches of usurers’ capital, and by means of state
priests, state schools and the corruptions of barrack life makes him a
victim of usurers’ politics.

The Russian bourgeoisie will surrender the entire revolutionary position
to the proletariat. It will also have to surrender the revolutionary
hegemony over the peasants. In such a situation, created by the
transference of power to the proletariat, nothing remains for the
peasantry to do but to rally to the regime of workers’ democracy. It
will not matter much even if the peasantry does this with a degree of
consciousness not larger than that with which it usually rallies to the
bourgeois regime. But while every bourgeois party commanding the votes
of the peasantry hastens to use its power in order to swindle and
deceive the peasants and then, if the worst comes to the worst, gives
place to another capitalist party, the proletariat, relying on the
peasantry, will bring all forces into play in order to raise the
cultural level of the countryside and develop the political
consciousness of the peasantry. From what we have said above, it will be
clear how we regard the idea of a ‘proletarian and peasant
dictatorship’. It is not really a matter of whether we regard it as
admissible in principle, whether ‘we do or do not desire’ such a form of
political co-operation. We simply think that it is unrealisable – at
least in a direct immediate sense.

Indeed, such a coalition presupposes either that one of the existing
bourgeois parties commands influence over the peasantry or that the
peasantry will have created a powerful independent party of its own, but
we have attempted to show that neither the one nor the other is
possible. 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Does the fact of the rise and development first of the Peasant Union
and then of the Group of Toil (Trudoviki) in the Duma run counter to
these and subsequent arguments? Not in the least. What is the Peasant
Union? A Union that embraces some elements of the radical democracy who
are looking for masses to support them, together with the more conscious
elements of the peasantry – obviously _not_ the lowest strata of the
peasantry – on the platform of a democratic revolution and agrarian
reform.

As to the agrarian programme of the Peasant Union (’equality in the use
of land’), which is the meaning of its existence, the following must be
observed: the wider and deeper the development of the agrarian movement
and the sooner it comes to the point of confiscation and distribution of
land, the sooner will the process of disintegration set in the Peasant
Union, in consequence of a thousand contradictions of a class, local,
everyday and technical nature. Its members will exercise their share of
influence in the Peasants’ Committees, the organs of the agrarian
revolution in the villages, but needless to say the Peasants’
Committees, _economic-administrative_ institutions, will not be able to
abolish the _political_ dependence of the country upon the town, which
forms one of the fundamental features of modern society.

The radicalism and formlessness of the Group of Toil was the expression
of the contradictoriness in the revolutionary aspirations of the
peasantry. During the period of constitutional illusions it helplessly
followed the ‘Cadets’ (Constitutional Democrats). At the moment of the
dissolution of the Duma it came naturally under the guidance of the
Social-Democratic Group. The lack of independence on the part of the
peasant representatives will show itself with particular clearness at
the moment when it becomes necessary to show firm initiative, that is,
at the time when power has to pass into the hands of the
revolutionaries. – _L.T._



VI THE PROLETARIAN REGIME


 

 

The proletariat can only achieve power by relying upon a national
upsurge and national enthusiasm. The proletariat will enter the
government as the revolutionary representative of the nation, as the
recognized national leader in the struggle against absolutism and feudal
barbarism. In taking power, however, it will open a new epoch, an epoch
of revolutionary legislation, of positive policy, and in this connection
it cannot at all be sure of retaining the role of the recognized
expressor of the will of the nation. The first measures of the
proletariat, cleansing the Augean stables of the old regime and driving
out its inmates, will meet with the active support of the whole nation,
in spite of what the liberal eunuchs may say about the tenacity of
certain prejudices among the masses of the people.

This political cleansing will be supplemented by a democratic
reorganization of all social and state relations. The workers’
government will be obliged, under the influence of direct pressures and
demands, to intervene decisively in all relationships and events ...

Its first task will have to be the dismissal from the army and
administration of all those who are stained with the blood of the
people, and the cashiering or disbandment of the regiments which have
most sullied themselves with crimes against the people. This will have
to be done in the very first days of the revolution, that is, long
before it is possible to introduce the system of elected and responsible
officials and organize a national militia. But the matter will not end
there. Workers’ democracy will immediately be confronted by questions of
the length of the working day, the agrarian question, and the problem of
unemployment.

One thing is clear. Every passing day will deepen the policy of the
proletariat in power, and more and more define its _class character_.
Side by side with that, the revolutionary ties between the proletariat
and the nation will be broken, the class disintegration of the peasantry
will assume political form, and the antagonism between the component
sections will grow in proportion as the policy of the workers’
government defines itself, ceasing to be a general-democratic and
becoming a class policy.

Though the absence of accumulated bourgeois-individualistic traditions
and anti-proletarian prejudices among the peasantry and intellectuals
will assist the proletariat to come into power, it is necessary on the
other hand to bear in mind that this absence of prejudices is due not to
political consciousness but to political barbarism, social formlessness,
primitiveness and lack of character. None of these features can in any
way create a reliable basis for a consistent, active proletarian policy.

The abolition of feudalism will meet with support from the _entire_
peasantry, as the burden-bearing estate. A progressive income-tax will
also be supported by the great majority of the peasantry. But any
legislation carried through for the purpose of protecting the
agricultural proletariat will not only not receive the active sympathy
of the majority, but will even meet with the active opposition of a
minority of the peasantry.

The proletariat will find itself compelled to carry the class struggle
into the villages and in this manner destroy that community of interest
which is undoubtedly to be found among all peasants, although within
comparatively narrow limits. From the very first moment after its taking
power, the proletariat will have to find support in the antagonisms
between the village poor and village rich, between the agricultural
proletariat and the agricultural bourgeoisie. While the heterogeneity of
the peasantry creates difficulties and narrows the basis for a
proletarian policy, the insufficient degree of class differentiation
will create obstacles to the introduction among the peasantry of
developed class struggle, upon which the urban proletariat could rely.
The primitiveness of the peasantry turns its hostile face towards the
proletariat.

The cooling-off of the peasantry, its political passivity, and all the
more the active opposition of its upper sections, cannot but have an
influence on a section of the intellectuals and the petty-bourgeoisie of
the towns.

Thus, the more definite and determined the policy of the proletariat in
power becomes, the narrower and more shaky does the ground beneath its
feet become. All this is extremely probable and even inevitable ...

The two main features of proletarian policy which will meet opposition
from the allies of the proletariat are _collectivism_ and
_internationalism_.

The primitiveness and petty-bourgeois character of the peasantry, its
limited rural outlook, its isolation from world-political ties and
allegiances, will create terrible difficulties for the consolidation of
the revolutionary policy of the proletariat in power.

To imagine that it is the business of Social Democrats to enter a
provisional government and lead it during the period of
revolutionary-democratic reforms, fighting for them to have a most
radical character, and relying for this purpose upon the organized
proletariat – and then, after the democratic programme has been carried
out, to leave the edifice they have constructed so as to make way for
the bourgeois parties and themselves go into opposition, thus opening up
a period of parliamentary politics, is to imagine the thing in a way
that would compromise the very idea of a workers’ government. This is
not because it is inadmissible ‘in principle’ – putting the question in
this abstract form is devoid of meaning – but because it is absolutely
unreal, it is utopianism of the worst sort – a sort of
revolutionary-philistine utopianism.

For this reason:

The division of our programme into maximum and minimum programmes has a
profound and tremendous principled significance during the period when
power lies in the hands of the bourgeoisie. The very fact of the
bourgeoisie being in power drives out of our minimum programme all
demands which are incompatible with private property in the means of
production. Such demands form the content of a socialist revolution and
presuppose a proletarian dictatorship.

Immediately, however, that power is transferred into the hands of a
revolutionary government with a socialist majority, the division of our
programme into maximum and minimum loses all significance, both in
principle and in immediate practice. A proletarian government under no
circumstances can confine itself within such limits. Take the question
of the eight-hour day. As is known, this by no means contradicts
capitalist relations, and therefore it forms an item in the minimum
programme of Social Democracy. But let us imagine the actual
introduction of this measure during a period of revolution, in a period
of intensified class passions; there is no question but that this
measure would then meet the organized and determined resistance of the
capitalists in the form, let us say, of lockouts and the closing down of
factories.

Hundreds of thousands of workers would find themselves thrown on the
streets. What should the government do? A bourgeois government, however
radical it might be, would never allow affairs to reach this stage
because, confronted with the closing-down of factories, it would be left
powerless. It would be compelled to retreat, the eight-hour day would
not be introduced and the indignant workers would be suppressed.

Under the political domination of the proletariat, the introduction of
an eight-hour day should lead to altogether different consequences. For
a government that desires to rely upon the proletariat, and not on
capital, as liberalism does, and which does not desire to play the role
of an ‘impartial’ intermediary of bourgeois democracy, the closing down
of factories would not of course be an excuse for increasing the working
day. For a workers’ government there would be only one way out:
expropriation of the closed factories and the organization of production
in them on a socialized basis.

Of course, one can argue in this way: we will suppose that the workers’
government, true to its programme, issues a decree for an eight-hour
day; if capital puts up a resistance which cannot be overcome by the
resources of a democratic programme based on the preservation of private
property, the Social Democrats will resign and appeal to the
proletariat. Such a solution would be a solution only from the
standpoint of the group constituting the membership of the government,
but it would be no solution for the proletariat or for the development
of the revolution. After the resignation of the Social Democrats, the
situation would be exactly as it was at the time when they were
compelled to take power. To flee before the organized opposition of
capital would be a greater betrayal of the revolution than a refusal to
take power in the first instance. It would really be far better for the
working-class party not to enter the government than to go in so as to
expose its own weakness and then to quit.

Let us take another example. The proletariat in power cannot but adopt
the most energetic measures to solve the question of unemployment,
because it is quite obvious that the representatives of the workers in
the government cannot reply to the demands of unemployed workers with
arguments about the bourgeois character of the revolution.

But if the government undertakes to maintain the unemployed – it is not
important for us at the moment in what form – this would mean an
immediate and quite substantial shift of economic power to the side of
the proletariat. The capitalists, who in their oppression of the workers
always relied upon the existence of a reserve army of labour, would feel
themselves _economically_ powerless while the revolutionary government,
at the same time, doomed them to _political_ impotence.

In undertaking the maintenance of the unemployed, the government thereby
undertakes the maintenance of strikers. If it does not do _that_, it
immediately and irrevocably undermines the basis of its own existence.

There is nothing left for the capitalists to do then but to resort to
the lockout, that is, to close the factories. It is quite clear that the
employers can stand the closing down of production much longer than the
workers, and therefore there is only one reply that a workers’
government can give to a general lockout: the expropriation of the
factories and the introduction in at least the largest of them of State
or communal production.

Similar problems arise in agriculture by the mere fact of the
expropriation of the land. In no way must it be supposed that a
proletarian government, on expropriating the privately-owned estates
carrying on production on a large scale, would break these up and sell
them for exploitation to small producers. The only path open to it in
this sphere is the organization of co-operative production under
communal control or organized directly by the State. But this is the
path to Socialism.

All this quite clearly shows that Social Democrats cannot enter a
revolutionary government, giving the workers in advance an undertaking
not to _give way_ on the minimum programme, and at the same time
promising the bourgeoisie not to _go beyond_ it. Such a bilateral
undertaking is absolutely impossible to realize. The very fact of the
proletariat’s representatives entering the government, not as powerless
hostages, but as the leading force, destroys the border-line between
maximum and minimum programme; that is to say, it _places collectivism
on the order of the day_. The point at which the proletariat will be
held up in its advance in this direction depends upon the relation of
forces, but in no way upon the original intentions of the proletarian
party.

For this reason there can be no talk of any sort of _special_ form of
proletarian dictatorship in the bourgeois revolution, of _democratic_
proletarian dictatorship (or dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry). The working class cannot preserve the democratic character
of its dictatorship without refraining from overstepping the limits of
its democratic programme. Any illusions on this point would be fatal.
They would compromise Social Democracy from the very start.

The proletariat, once having taken power, will fight for it to the very
end. While one of the weapons in this struggle for the maintenance and
the consolidation of power will be agitation and organization,
especially in the countryside, another will be a policy of collectivism.
Collectivism will become not only the inevitable way forward from the
position in which the party in power will find itself, but will also be
a means of preserving this position with the support of the proletariat.

When the idea of uninterrupted revolution was formulated in the
socialist press – an idea which connected the liquidation of absolutism
and feudalism with a socialist revolution, along with growing social
conflicts, uprisings of new sections of the masses, unceasing attacks by
the proletariat upon the economic and political privileges of the ruling
classes – our ‘progressive’ press raised a unanimous howl of
indignation. ‘Oh!’ it cried, ‘we have put up with a lot, but we cannot
allow this. Revolution,’ it cried, ‘is not a road that can be
“legalized”. The application of exceptional measures is only permissible
under exceptional circumstances. The aim of the movement for
emancipation is not to make revolution permanent but to lead it as soon
as possible into the channel of _law_,’ etc., etc.

The more radical representatives of this same democracy do not risk
taking up a stand against revolution even from the point of view of
already-secured constitutional ‘gains’. For them this parliamentary
cretinism, preceding the rise of parliamentarism itself, does not
constitute a strong weapon in the struggle against the proletarian
revolution. They choose another path. They take their stand not on the
basis of law but on what seems to them the basis of facts – on the basis
of historical ‘possibility’, on the basis of political ‘realism’ and,
finally ... finally, even on the basis of ‘marxism’. And why not? That
pious Venetian bourgeois, Antonio, very aptly said:

‘The devil can quote Scripture to his purpose.’

These radical democrats not only regard the idea of a workers’
government in Russia as fantastic, but they even deny the possibility of
a socialist revolution in Europe in the historical epoch immediately
ahead. ‘The pre-requisites of revolution’, they say, ‘are not yet
visible.’ Is that true? Certainly there is no question of appointing a
dateline for the socialist revolution, but it is necessary to point out
its real historical prospects.



VII THE PRE-REQUISITES OF SOCIALISM


 

 

Marxism converted socialism into a science, but this does not prevent
some ‘Marxists’ from converting Marxism into a Utopia.

Rozhkov, arguing against the programme of socialization and
co-operation, presents the ‘necessary pre-requisites of the future
society, firmly laid down by Marx’, in the following way: ‘Are there
already present,’ asks Rozhkov, ‘the material objective pre-requisites,
consisting of such a development of technique as would reduce the motive
of personal gain and concern for cash [?], personal effort, enterprise
and risk, to a minimum, and which would thereby make social production a
front-rank question? Such a level of technique is most closely connected
with the almost complete [!] domination of large-scale production in all
[!] branches of the economy. Has such a stage been reached? Even the
subjective, psychological pre-requisites are lacking, such as the growth
of class-consciousness among the proletariat, developed to such a level
as to achieve the spiritual unity of the overwhelming mass of the
people. We know,’ continues Rozhkov, ‘of producer associations such as
the well-known French glassworks at Albi, and several agricultural
associations, also in France, and yet the experience of France shows, as
nothing else can, that even the conditions of so advanced a country are
not sufficiently developed to permit the dominance of co-operation.
These enterprises are of only the average size, their technical level is
not higher than ordinary capitalist undertakings, _they are not at the
head of industrial development, do not lead it_, but approach a modest
average level.

‘Only when the experience of individual productive associations points
to their leading role in economic life can we say that we approaching a
new system, only then can we be sure that the necessary conditions for
its existence have been established.’ [1]

While respecting the good intentions of Comrade Rozhkov, we regretfully
have to confess that rarely even in bourgeois literature have we met
such confusion as he betrays with regard to what are known as the
pre-requisites of socialism. It will be worthwhile dwelling to some
extent on this confusion, if not for the sake of Rozhkov, at least for
the sake of the question.

Rozhkov declares that we have not yet reached ‘such a stage of technical
development as would reduce the motive of personal gain and concern for
cash [?], personal effort, enterprise and risk, to a minimum, and which
would make social production a front-rank question’.

It is rather difficult to find the meaning of this passage. Apparently
Rozhkov wishes to say, in the first place, that modern technique has not
yet sufficiently ousted human labour-power from industry and, secondly,
that to secure this elimination would require the ‘almost’ _complete
domination_ of large state enterprises in all branches of the economy,
and therefore the ‘almost’ _complete proletarianization of the whole
population of the country._ These are the two prerequisites to socialism
alleged to have been ‘firmly laid down by Marx’.

Let us try and imagine the setting of capitalist relations which,
according to Rozhkov, socialism will encounter when it arrives. ‘The
almost complete domination of large-scale enterprise in all branches of
industry’, under capitalism, means, as has been said, the
proletarianization of all small and medium producers in agriculture and
industry, that is to say, the conversion of the whole of the population
into proletarians. But the complete domination of machine technique in
these large undertakings would lead to the reduction of the employment
of human labour-power to a minimum, and therefore the overwhelming
majority of the population of the country – say, 90 per cent – would be
converted into a reserve army of labour living at the expense of the
State in workhouses. We said 90 per cent of the population, but there is
nothing to prevent us from being logical and imagining a state of
affairs in which the whole of production consists of a single automatic
mechanism, belonging to a single syndicate and requiring as living
labour only a single trained orang-outang. As we know, this is the
brilliantly consistent theory of Professor Tugan-Baranovsky. Under such
conditions ‘social production’ not only occupies ‘front rank’ but
commands the whole field. Under these circumstances, moreover,
_consumption_ would naturally also become _socialized_ in view of the
fact that the whole of the nation, except the 10 per cent who own the
trust, will be living at the public expense in workhouses. Thus, behind
Rozhkov we see smiling the familiar face of Tugan-Baranovsky. Socialism
can now come on the scene. The population emerges from the workhouses
and expropriates the group of expropriators. No revolution or
dictatorship of the proletariat is of course necessary.

The second economic sign of the ripeness of a country for socialism,
according to Rozhkov, is the possibility of the _domination_ of
co-operative production within it. Even in France the co-operative
glassworks at Albi is not on a higher level than any other capitalist
undertaking. Socialist production becomes possible only when the
co-operatives are _in the forefront of industrial development_, as the
_leading_ enterprises.

The entire argument from beginning to end is turned inside out. The
co-operatives cannot take the lead in industrial progress, not because
economic development has not gone far enough, but because it has gone
_too far_ ahead. Undoubtedly, economic development creates the basis for
co-operation, but for what kind of co-operation? For capitalist
co-operation, based on wage-labour – every factory shows us a picture of
such capitalist co-operation. With the development of technique the
importance of such co-operation grows also. But in what manner can the
development of capitalism place the co-operative societies ‘in the front
rank of industry’? On what does Rozhkov base his hopes that the
co-operative societies can squeeze out the syndicates and trusts and
take their place in the forefront of industrial development? It is
evident that if this took place the co-operative societies would then
simply have automatically to expropriate all capitalist undertakings,
after which it would remain for them to reduce the working day
sufficiently to provide work for all citizens and to regulate the amount
of production in the various branches in order to avoid crises. In this
manner the main features of socialism would be established. Again it is
clear that no revolution and no dictatorship of the working class would
be at all necessary.

The third pre-requisite is a psychological one: the need for ‘the
class-consciousness of the proletariat to have reached such a stage as
to unite spiritually the overwhelming majority of the people’. As
‘spiritual unity’, in this instance, must evidently be regarded as
meaning conscious socialist solidarity, it follows therefore that
Comrade Rozhkov considers that a psychological pre-requisite of
socialism is the organization of the ‘overwhelming majority of the
population’ within the Social-Democratic Party. Rozhkov evidently
assumes therefore that capitalism, throwing the small producers into the
ranks of the proletariat, and the mass of the proletarians into the
ranks of the reserve army of labour, will create the possibility for
Social Democracy spiritually to unite and enlighten the _overwhelming
majority_ (90 per cent?) of the people.

This is as impossible of realization in the world of capitalist
barbarism as the domination of co-operatives in the realm of capitalist
competition. But if this were realizable, then of course, the
consciously and spiritually united ‘overwhelming majority’ of the nation
would crush without any difficulty the few magnates of capital and
organize socialist economy without revolution or dictatorship.

But here the following question arises. Rozhkov regards Marx as his
teacher. Yet Marx, having outlined the ‘essential prerequisites for
socialism’ in his COMMUNIST MANIFESTO, regarded the revolution of 1848
as the immediate prologue to the socialist revolution. Of course one
does not require much penetration after 60 years to see that Marx was
mistaken, because the capitalist world still exists. But how could Marx
have made _this_ error? Did he not perceive that large-scale
undertakings did not yet dominate in all branches of industry; that
producers’ co-operatives did not yet stand at the head of the
large-scale enterprises; that the overwhelming majority of the people
were not yet united on the basis of the ideas set out in the COMMUNIST
MANIFESTO? If we do not see these things even now, how is it then that
Marx did not perceive that nothing of the kind existed in 1848?
Apparently, Marx in 1848 was a Utopian youth in comparison with many of
the present-day infallible automata of Marxism!

We thus see that although Comrade Rozhkov by no means belongs among the
critics of Marx, nevertheless he completely discards the proletarian
revolution as an essential pre-requisite of socialism. As Rozhkov has
only too consistently expressed the views shared by a considerable
number of Marxists in both trends of our party, it is necessary to dwell
on the bases in principle and method of the errors he has made.

One must observe in passing that Rozhkov’s argument concerning the
destiny of the co-operatives is his very own. We have never and nowhere
met socialists who both believed in such a simple irresistible progress
of the concentration of production and proletarianization of the people
and at the same time believed in the dominating role of producers’
co-operative societies prior to the proletarian revolution. To unite
these two pre-requisites is much more difficult in economic evolution
than in one’s head; although even the latter had always seemed to us
impossible.

But we will deal with two other ‘pre-requisites’ which constitute more
typical prejudices. Undoubtedly, the concentration of production, the
development of technique and the growth of consciousness among the
masses are essential pre-requisites for socialism. But these processes
take place simultaneously, and not only give an impetus to each other,
but also retard and _limit_ each other. Each of these processes at a
higher level demands a certain development of another process at a lower
level. But the complete development of each of them is incompatible with
the complete development of the others.

The development of technique undoubtedly finds its ideal limit in a
single automatic mechanism which takes raw materials from the womb of
nature and throws them at the feet of man in the form of finished
articles of consumption. If the existence of the capitalist system were
not limited by class relations and the revolutionary struggle that
arises from them, we should have some grounds for supposing that
technique, approaching the ideal of a single automatic mechanism within
the framework of the capitalist system, would thereby automatically
abolish capitalism.

The concentration of production arising from the laws of competition
inherently tends towards proletarianizing the whole population.
Isolating this tendency, we should be right in supposing that capitalism
would carry out its work to the end, if the process of
proletarianization were not interrupted by a revolution; but this is
inevitable, given a certain relationship of forces, long before
capitalism has converted the majority of the nation into a reserve army,
confined to prison-like barracks.

Further – consciousness, thanks to the experience of the everyday
struggle and the conscious efforts of the socialist parties, undoubtedly
grows progressively, and, isolating this process, we could in
imagination follow this growth until the majority of the people were
included in the trade unions and political organizations, united by a
spirit of solidarity and singleness of aim. If this process could really
increase quantitatively without being affected qualitatively, socialism
could be realized peaceably by a unanimous, conscious ‘civil act’ some
time in the 21st or the 22nd century.

But the whole point lies in the fact that the processes which are
historically pre-requisite for socialism do not develop in isolation,
but limit each other, and, reaching a certain stage, determined by
numerous circumstances – which, however, is far removed from the
mathematical limit of these processes – they undergo a qualitative
change, and in their complex combination bring about what we understand
by the name of social revolution.

We will begin with the last-mentioned process – the growth of
consciousness. This takes place, as we know, not in academies, in which
it might be possible artificially to detain the proletariat for fifty, a
hundred or five hundred years, but in the course of all-round life in
capitalist society, on the basis of unceasing class struggle. The growth
of the consciousness of the proletariat transforms this class struggle,
gives it a deeper and more purposeful character, which in its turn calls
out a corresponding reaction on the part of the dominant class. The
struggle of the proletariat against the bourgeoisie will reach its
denouement long before large-scale enterprises begin to dominate in all
branches of industry.

Further, it is of course true that the growth of political consciousness
depends upon the growth of the numbers of the proletariat, and
proletarian dictatorship presupposes that the numbers of the proletariat
will be sufficiently large to overcome the resistance of the bourgeois
counter-revolution. But this does not at all mean that the ‘overwhelming
majority’ of the population must be proletarians and the ‘overwhelming
majority’ of the proletariat conscious socialists. It is clear, of
course, that the conscious revolutionary army of the proletariat must be
stronger than the counter-revolutionary army of capital, while the
intermediate, doubtful or indifferent strata of the population must be
in such a position that the regime of proletarian dictatorship will
attract them to the side of the revolution and not repel them to the
side of its enemies. Naturally, proletarian policy must consciously take
this into consideration.

All this in its turn presupposes the hegemony of industry over
agriculture and the domination of town over country.

We will now endeavour to examine the pre-requisites of socialism in
diminishing order of generality and increasing order of complexity.

1. Socialism is not merely a question of equal distribution but also a
question of planned production. Socialism, that is, co-operative
production on a large scale, is possible only when the development of
productive forces has reached the stage at which large enterprises are
more productive than small ones. The more the large enterprises outweigh
the smaller, i.e., the more developed technique has become, the more
advantageous economically does socialized production become, and,
consequently, the higher must the cultural level of the whole population
be as a result of equal distribution based upon planned production.

This first objective pre-requisite of socialism has been in existence a
long time – ever since the time when social division of labour led to
the division of labour in manufacture. It has existed to an even greater
extent since the time when manufacture was replaced by factory, machine
production. Large undertakings became more and more advantageous, which
also meant that the socialization of these large undertakings would have
made society more and more wealthy. It is clear that the transition of
all the handicraft workshops to the common ownership of all the
handicraftsmen would not have made the latter one whit richer, whereas
the transfer of manufactures to the common ownership of their
detail-workers, or the transfer of the factories into the hands of the
workers employed in them – or, it would be better to say, the transfer
of all the means of large factory production into the hands of the whole
population – would undoubtedly raise the people’s material level; and
the higher the stage reached by large-scale production, the higher would
be this level.

In socialist literature the instance is often quoted of the English
Member of Parliament, Bellers [2] who, in 1696, i.e., a century before
the conspiracy of Babeuf, submitted to Parliament a project for
establishing co-operative societies which should independently supply
all their own requirements. According to this measure, these producers’
co-operatives were to consist of from two to three hundred persons. We
cannot here test his argument, nor is it necessary for our purpose; what
is important is that collective economy, even if it was conceived only
in terms of groups of 100, 200, 300 or 500 persons, was regarded as
advantageous from the standpoint of production already at the end of the
17th century.

At the beginning of the 19th century Fourier drew up his schemes for
producer-consumer associations, ‘phalansteries’, each consisting of from
2,000 to 3,000 persons. Fourier’s calculations were never distinguished
by their exactness; but at all events, the development of manufacture by
that time suggested to him a field for economic collectives incomparably
wider than in the example quoted above. It is clear, however, that both
the associations of John Bellers and the ‘phalansteries’ of Fourier are
much nearer in their character to the free economic communes of which
the Anarchists dream, the utopianism of which consists not in their
‘impossibility’ or in their being ‘against nature’ – the communist
communes in America proved that they were possible – but in that they
have lagged 100 to 200 years behind the progress of economic
development.

The development of the social division of labour, on the one hand, and
machine production on the other, has led to the position that nowadays
the only co-operative body which could utilize the advantages of
collective production on a wide scale is the State. More than that,
socialist production, for both economic and political reasons, could not
be confined within the restricting limits of individual states.

Atlanticus [3], a German Socialist who did not adopt the Marxist point
of view, calculated at the end of last century the economic advantages
that would accrue from applying socialist economy in a unit such as
Germany. Atlanticus was not at all distinguished by flights of fancy.
His ideas generally moved within the circle of the economic routine of
capitalism. He based his arguments on the writings of authoritative
modern agronomists and engineers. This does not weaken his arguments,
rather is it his strong side, because it preserves him from undue
optimism. In any case, Atlanticus comes to the conclusion that, with
proper organization of socialist economy, with employment of the
technical resources of the mid-nineties of the 19th century, the income
of the workers could be doubled or trebled, and that the working day
could be halved.

One should not imagine, however, that Atlanticus was the first to show
the economic advantages of socialism. The greater productivity of labour
in large undertakings, on the one hand, and, on the other, the necessity
for the planning of production, as proved by the economic crises, has
been much more convincing evidence for the necessity of socialism than
Atlanticus’s socialistic book-keeping. His service consists only in that
he expressed these advantages in approximate figures.

From what has been said we are justified in arriving at the conclusion
that the further growth of the technical power of man will render
socialism more and more advantageous; that sufficient technical
pre-requisites for collective production have already existed for a
hundred or two hundred years, and that at the present moment socialism
is _technically advantageous_ not only on a national but to an enormous
extent also on a world scale.

The mere technical advantages of socialism were not at all sufficient
for it to be realized. During the 18th and 19th centuries the advantages
of large-scale production showed themselves not in a socialist but in a
capitalist form. Neither the schemes of Bellers nor those of Fourier
were carried out. Why not? Because there were no social forces existent
at that time ready and able to carry them out.

2. We now pass from the productive-technical pre-requisites of socialism
to the _social-economic_ ones. If we had to deal here not with a society
split up by class antagonism, but with a homogeneous community which
consciously selects its form of economy, the calculations of Atlanticus
would undoubtedly be quite sufficient for socialist construction to be
begun. Atlanticus himself, being a socialist of a very vulgar type,
thus, indeed, regarded his own work. Such a point of view at the present
day could be applied only within the limits of the private business of a
single person or of a company. One is always justified in assuming that
any scheme of economic reform, such as the introduction of new
machinery, new raw materials, a new form of management of labour, or new
systems of remuneration, will always be accepted by the owners if only
these schemes can be shown to offer a commercial advantage. But in so
far as we have to do here with the economy of society, that is not
sufficient. Here, opposing interests are in conflict. What is
advantageous for one is disadvantageous for another. The egoism of one
class acts not only against the egoism of another, but also to the
disadvantage of the whole community. Therefore, in order to realize
socialism it is necessary that among the antagonistic classes of
capitalist society there should be a social force which is interested,
by virtue of its objective position, in the realization of socialism,
and which is powerful enough to be able to overcome hostile interests
and resistances in order to realize it.

One of the fundamental services rendered by scientific socialism
consists in that it theoretically discovered such a social force in the
proletariat, and showed that this class, inevitably growing along with
capitalism, can find its salvation only in socialism, that the entire
position of the proletariat drives it towards socialism and that the
doctrine of socialism cannot but become in the long run the ideology of
the proletariat.

It is easy to understand therefore what a tremendous step backwards
Atlanticus takes when he asserts that, once it is proved that, ‘by
transferring the means of production into the hands of the State, not
only can the general well being be secured, but the working-day also
reduced, then it is a matter of indifference whether the theory of the
concentration of capital and the disappearance of the intermediate
classes of society is confirmed or not’.

According to Atlanticus, immediately the advantages of socialism have
been proved, ‘it is useless resting one’s hopes on the fetish of
economic development, one should make extensive investigations and start
[!] a comprehensive and thorough preparation for the transition from
private to state or “social” production’. [4]

In objecting to the purely oppositional tactics of the Social Democrats
and suggesting an immediate ‘start’ in preparing the transition to
socialism, Atlanticus forgets that the Social Democrats still lack the
power needed for this, and that Wilhelm II, Bülow and the majority in
the German Reichstag, although they have power in their hands, have not
the slightest intention of introducing socialism. The socialist schemes
of Atlanticus are no more convincing to the Hohenzollerns than the
schemes of Fourier were to the restored Bourbons, notwithstanding the
fact that the latter based his political utopianism on passionate
fantasies in the field of economic theory, whereas Atlanticus, in his
not less utopian politics, based himself on convincing,
philistinely-sober book-keeping.

What level must social differentiation have attained in order that the
second pre-requisite for socialism may be realized? In other words, what
must be the relative numerical weight of the proletariat? Must it make
up a half, two-thirds or nine-tenths of the population? It would be an
absolutely hopeless undertaking to try to define the bare arithmetical
limits of this second prerequisite for socialism. In the first place, in
such a schematic effort, we should have to decide the question of who is
to be included in the category ‘proletariat’. Should we include the
large class of semi-proletarian semi-peasants? Should we include the
reserve masses of the urban proletariat – who on the one hand merge into
the parasitical proletariat of beggars and thieves, and on the other
fill the city streets as small traders playing a parasitical role in
relation to the economic system as a whole? This question is not at all
a simple one.

The importance of the proletariat depends entirely on the role it plays
in large-scale production. The bourgeoisie relies, in its struggle for
political domination, upon its economic power. Before it manages to
secure political power, it concentrates the country’s means of
production in its own hands. This is what determines its specific weight
in society. The proletariat, however, in spite of all co-operative
phantasmagoria, will be deprived of the means of production right up to
the actual socialist revolution. Its social power comes from the fact
that the means of production which are in the hands of the bourgeoisie
can be set in motion only by the proletariat. From the point of view of
the bourgeoisie, the proletariat is also one of the means of production,
constituting, in conjunction with the others, a single unified
mechanism. The proletariat, however, is the only non-automatic part of
this mechanism, and in spite of all efforts it cannot be reduced to the
condition of an automaton. This position gives the proletariat the power
to hold up at will, partially or wholly, the proper functioning of the
economy of society, through partial or general strikes. From this it is
clear that the importance of a proletariat – given identical numbers –
increases in proportion to the amount of productive forces which it sets
in motion. That is to say, a proletarian in a large factory is, all
other things being equal, a greater social magnitude than a handicraft
worker, and an urban worker a greater magnitude than a country worker.
In other words, the political role of the proletariat is the more
important in proportion as large-scale production dominates small
production, industry dominates agriculture and the town dominates the
country. If we take the history of Germany or of England in the period
when the proletariat of these countries formed the same proportion of
the nation as the proletariat now forms in Russia, we shall see that
they not only did not play, but by their objective importance could not
play, such a role as the Russian proletariat plays today.

The same thing, as we have seen, applies to the role of the towns. When,
in Germany, the population of the towns was only 15 per cent of the
whole population of the country, as it is in Russia today, there could
be no thought of the German towns playing that role in the economic and
political life of the country which the Russian towns play today. The
concentration of large industrial and commercial institutions in the
towns, and the linking of the towns and the provinces by means of a
system of railways, has given our towns an importance far exceeding the
mere number of their inhabitants; the growth of their importance has
greatly exceeded the growth of their population, while the growth of the
population of the towns in its turn has exceeded the natural increase of
the population of the country as a whole ... In Italy in 1848 the number
of handicraftsmen – not only proletarians but also independent masters –
amounted to about 15 per cent of the population, i.e., not less than the
proportion of handicraftsmen and proletarians in Russia at the present
day. But the role played by them was incomparably less than that played
by the modern Russian industrial proletariat.

From what has been said it should be clear that the attempt to define in
advance what proportion of the whole population must be proletarian at
the moment of the conquest of political power is a fruitless task.
Instead of that, we will offer a few rough figures showing the relative
numerical strength of the proletariat in the advanced countries at the
present time. The occupied population of Germany in 1895 was 20,500,000
(not including the army, state officials and persons without a definite
occupation). Out of this number there were 12,500,000 proletarians
(including wage-workers in agriculture, industry, commerce and also
domestic service); the number of agricultural and workers being
10,750,000. Many of the remaining 8,000,000 are really also
proletarians, such as workers in domestic industries, working members of
the family, etc. The number of wage-workers in agriculture taken
separately was 5,750,000. The agricultural population composed 36 per
cent of the entire population of the country. These figures, we repeat,
refer to 1895. The eleven years that have passed since then have
unquestionably produced a tremendous change – in the direction of an
increase in the proportion of the urban to the agricultural population
(in 1882 the agricultural population was 42 per cent of the whole), an
increase in the proportion of the industrial proletariat to the
agricultural proletariat, and, finally, an increase in the amount of
productive capital per industrial worker as compared with 1895. But even
the 1895 figures show that the German proletariat already long ago
constituted the dominant productive force in the country.

Belgium, with its 7,000,000 population, is a purely industrial country.
Out of every hundred persons engaged in some occupation, 41 are in
industry in the strict sense of the word and only 21 are employed in
agriculture. Out of the 3,000,000-odd gainfully employed, nearly
1,800,000, i.e., 60 per cent, are proletarians. This figure would become
much more expressive if we added to the sharply differentiated
proletariat the social elements related to it – the so-called
‘independent’ producers who are independent only in form but are
actually enslaved to capital, the lower officials, the soldiers, etc.

But first place as regards industrialization of the economy and
proletarianization of the population must undoubtedly be accorded to
Britain. In 1901 the number of persons employed in agriculture, forestry
and fisheries was 2,300,000, while the number in industry, commerce and
transport was 12,500,000. We see, therefore, that in the chief European
countries the population of the towns predominates numerically over the
population of the countryside. But the great predominance of the urban
population lies not only in the mass of productive forces that it
constitutes, but also in its qualitative personal composition. The town
attracts the most energetic, able and intelligent elements of the
countryside. To prove this statistically is difficult, although the
comparative age composition of the population of town and country
provides indirect evidence of it. The latter fact has a significance of
its own. In Germany in 1896 there were calculated to be 8,000,000
persons employed in agriculture and 8,000,000 in industry. But if we
divide the population according to age-groups, we see that agriculture
has 1,000,000 able-bodied persons between the ages of 14 and 40—less
than in industry. This shows that it is ‘the old and the young’ who
pre-eminently remain in the country.

All this leads us to the conclusion that economic evolution – the growth
of industry, the growth of large enterprises, the growth of the towns,
and the growth of the proletariat in general and the industrial
proletariat in particular – has already prepared the arena not only for
the _struggle_ of the proletariat for political power but for the
_conquest_ of this power.

3. Now we come to the third pre-requisite of socialism, the dictatorship
of the proletariat. Politics is the plane upon which the objective
pre-requisites of socialism are intersected by the subjective ones.
Under certain definite social-economic conditions, a class consciously
sets itself a certain aim – the conquest of political power; it unites
its forces, weighs up the strength of the enemy and estimates the
situation. Even in this third sphere, however, the proletariat is not
absolutely free. Besides the subjective factors – consciousness,
preparedness and initiative, the development of which also have their
own logic – the proletariat in carrying out its policy comes up against
a number of objective factors such as the policy of the ruling classes
and the existing State institutions (such as the army, the class
schools, the State church), international relations, etc.

We will deal first of all with the subjective conditions: the
preparedness of the proletariat for a socialist revolution. It is, of
course, not sufficient that the standard of technique has rendered
socialist economy advantageous from the point of view of the
productivity of social labour. It is not sufficient, either, that the
social differentiation based on this technique has created a proletariat
which is the main class by virtue of its numbers and its economic role,
and which is objectively interested in socialism. It is further
necessary that this class should be _conscious_ of its objective
interests; it is necessary that it should _understand_ that there is no
way out for it except through socialism; it is necessary that it should
combine in an army sufficiently powerful to conquer political power in
open battle.

It would be stupid at the present time to deny the necessity for the
proletariat to be prepared in this manner. Only old-fashioned Blanquists
can hope for salvation from the initiative of conspiratorial
organizations which have taken shape independently of the masses; or
their antipodes, the anarchists, might hope for a spontaneous, elemental
outburst of the masses, the end of which no one can tell.
Social-Democrats speak of the conquest of power as the _conscious action
of a revolutionary class_.

But many socialist ideologues (ideologues in the bad sense of the word –
those who stand everything on its head) speak of preparing the
proletariat for socialism in the sense of its being morally regenerated.
The proletariat, and even ‘humanity’ in general, must first of all cast
out its old egoistical nature, and altruism must become predominant in
social life, etc. As we are as yet far from such a state of affairs, and
‘human nature’ changes very slowly, socialism is put off for several
centuries. Such a point of view probably seems very realistic and
evolutionary, and so forth, but as a matter of fact it is really nothing
but shallow moralizing.

It is assumed that a socialist psychology must be developed before the
coming of socialism, in other words that it is possible for the masses
to acquire a socialist psychology under capitalism. One must not confuse
here the conscious striving towards socialism with socialist psychology.
The latter presupposes the absence of egotistical motives in economic
life; whereas the striving towards socialism and the struggle for it
arise from the class psychology of the proletariat. However many points
of contact there may be between the class psychology of the proletariat
and classless socialist psychology, nevertheless a deep chasm divides
them.

The joint struggle against exploitation engenders splendid shoots of
idealism, comradely solidarity and self-sacrifice, but at the same time
the individual struggle for existence, the ever-yawning abyss of
poverty, the differentiation in the ranks of the workers themselves, the
pressure of the ignorant masses from below, and the corrupting influence
of the bourgeois parties do not permit these splendid shoots to develop
fully. For all that, in spite of his remaining philistinely egoistic,
and without his exceeding in ‘human’ worth the average representative of
the bourgeois classes, the average worker knows from experience that
_his simplest requirements and natural desires can be satisfied only on
the ruins of the capitalist system_.

The idealists picture the distant future generation which shall have
become worthy of socialism exactly as Christians picture the members of
the first Christian communes.

Whatever the psychology of the first proselytes of Christianity may have
been – we know from the Acts of the Apostles of cases of embezzlement of
communal property – in any case, as it became more widespread,
Christianity not only failed to regenerate the souls of all the people,
but itself degenerated, became materialistic and bureaucratic; from the
practice of fraternal teaching one of another it changed into papalism,
from wandering beggary into monastic parasitism; in short, not only did
Christianity fail to subject to itself the social conditions of the
milieu in which it spread, but it was itself subjected by them. This did
not result from the lack of ability or the greed of the fathers and
teachers of Christianity, but as a consequence of the inexorable laws of
the dependence of human psychology upon the conditions of social life
and labour, and the fathers and teachers of Christianity showed this
dependence in their own persons.

If socialism aimed at creating a new human nature within the limits of
the old society it would be nothing more than a new edition of the
moralistic utopias. Socialism does not aim at creating a socialist
psychology as a pre-requisite to socialism but at creating socialist
conditions of life as a pre-requisite to socialist psychology. 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. N. Rozhkov, ON THE AGRARIAN QUESTION, pp.21 and 22. – _L.T._

2. John Bellers was not an MP, but a Quaker landowner, who published his
plan in the form of an address to parliament.

3. G. Jaegkh

4. Atlanticus, THE STATE OF THE FUTURE, published by DYELO, St.
Petersburg 1906, pp.22 and 23. – _L.T._



VIII A WORKERS’ GOVERNMENT IN RUSSIA AND SOCIALISM


 

 

We have shown above that the objective pre-requisites for a socialist
revolution have already been created by the economic development of the
advanced capitalist countries. But what can we say in this connection
with regard to Russia?

Can we expect that the transference of power into the hands of the
Russian proletariat will be the beginning of the transformation of our
national economy into a socialist one? A year ago we replied to this
question in an article which was subjected to a severe crossfire of
criticism by the organs of both factions of our party. In this article
we said the following:

‘“The Paris workers,” Marx tells us, “did not demand miracles from their
Commune.” We, too, must not expect immediate miracles from proletarian
dictatorship today. Political power is not omnipotence. It would be
absurd to suppose that it is only necessary for the proletariat to take
power and then by passing a few decrees to substitute socialism for
capitalism. An economic system is not the product of the actions of the
government. All that the proletariat can do is to apply its political
power with all possible energy in order to ease and shorten the path of
economic evolution towards collectivism.

‘The proletariat will begin with those reforms which figure in what is
known as the minimum programme; and directly from these the very logic
of its position will compel it to pass over to collectivist measures.

‘The introduction of the eight-hour day and the steeply progressive
income-tax will be comparatively easy, although even here the centre of
gravity will lie not in the passing of the “act” but in organizing the
practical carrying out of the measures. But the chief difficulty will be
– and herein lies the transition to collectivism! – in the state
organization of production in those factories which have been closed by
their owners in reply to the passing of these acts. To pass a law for
the abolition of the right of inheritance and to put such a law into
effect will be a comparatively easy task. Legacies in the form of money
capital also will not embarrass the proletariat or burden its economy.
But to act as the inheritor of land and industrial capital means that
the workers’ state must be prepared to undertake the organizing of
social production.

‘The same thing, but to a wider degree, must be said of expropriation –
with or without compensation. Expropriation with compensation would be
politically advantageous but financially difficult, whereas
expropriation without compensation would be financially advantageous but
politically difficult. But the greatest difficulties of all will be met
within the organization of production. We repeat, a government of the
proletariat is not a government that can perform miracles.

‘The socialization of production will commence with those branches of
industry which present the least difficulties. In the first period,
socialized production will be like a number of eases, connected with
private undertakings by the laws of commodity circulation. The wider the
field of social production becomes extended, the more obvious will
become its advantages, the firmer will the new political regime feel,
and the bolder will the further economic measures of the proletariat
become. In these measures it can and will rely not merely upon the
national productive forces, but also upon the technique of the whole
world, just as in its revolutionary policy it will rely on the
experience not only of the class relations within the country but also
on the whole historical experience of the international proletariat.’

The political domination of the proletariat is incompatible with its
economic enslavement. No matter under what political flag the
proletariat has come to power, it is obliged to take the path of
socialist policy. It would be the greatest utopianism to think that the
proletariat, having been raised to political domination by the internal
mechanism of a bourgeois revolution, can, even if it so desires, limit
its mission to the creation of republican-democratic conditions for the
social domination of the bourgeoisie. The political domination of the
proletariat, even if it is only temporary, will weaken to an extreme
degree the resistance of capital, which always stands in need of the
support of the state, and will give the economic struggle of the
proletariat tremendous scope. The workers cannot but demand maintenance
for strikers from the revolutionary government, and a government relying
upon the workers cannot refuse this demand. But this means paralyzing
the effect of the reserve army of labour and making the workers dominant
not only in the political but also in the economic field, and converting
private property in the means of production into a fiction. These
inevitable social-economic consequences of proletarian dictatorship will
reveal themselves very quickly, long before the democratization of the
political system has been completed. The barrier between the ‘minimum’
and the ‘maximum’ programme disappears immediately the proletariat comes
to power.

The first thing the proletarian regime must deal with on coming into
power is the solution of the agrarian question, with which the fate of
vast masses of the population of Russia is bound up. In the solution of
this question, as in all others, the proletariat will be guided by the
fundamental aim of its economic policy, i.e., to command as large as
possible a field in which to carry out the organization of socialist
economy. The form and tempo of the execution of this agrarian policy,
however, must be determined by the material resources at the disposal of
the proletariat, as well as by care to act so as not to throw possible
aIlies into the ranks of the counter-revolutionaries.

The _agrarian_ question, i.e., the question of the fate of agriculture
in its social relations, is not, of course, exhausted by the _land_
question, i.e., the question of forms of landownership. There is no
doubt, however, that the solution of the land question, even if it does
not predetermine agrarian evolution, will at least predetermine the
agrarian policy of the proletariat: in other words, what the proletarian
regime does with the land must be closely connected with its general
attitude to the course and the requirements of agricultural development.
For that reason the land question occupies first place.

One solution of the land question, to which the
Socialist-Revolutionaries have given a far from irreproachable
popularity, is the socialization of all land; a term, which, relieved of
its European make-up, means nothing else than the ‘equalization of the
use of land’ (or ‘black redistribution’). The programme of the equal
distribution of the land thus presupposes the expropriation of all land,
not only privately-owned land in general, or privately-owned peasant
land, but even communal land. If we bear in mind that this expropriation
would have to be one of the first acts of the new regime, while
commodity-capitalist relations were still completely dominant, then we
shall see that the first ‘victims’ of this expropriation would be (or
rather, would feel themselves to be) the peasantry. If we bear in mind
that the peasant, during several decades, has paid the redemption money
which should have converted the allotted land into his own private
property; if we bear in mind that some of the more well-to-do of the
peasants have acquired – undoubtedly by making considerable sacrifices,
borne by a still-existing generation – large tracts of land as private
property, then it will be easily imagined what a tremendous resistance
would be aroused by the attempt to convert communal and small-scale
privately-owned lands into state property. If it acted in such a fashion
the new regime would begin by rousing a tremendous opposition against
itself among the peasantry.

For what purpose should communal and small-scale privately-owned land be
converted into state property? In order, in one way or another, to make
it available for ‘equal’ economic exploitation by all landowners,
including the present landless peasants and agricultural labourers.
Thus, the new regime would gain nothing _economically_ by the
expropriation of small holdings and communal land, since, after the
redistribution, the state or public lands would be cultivated as private
holdings. _Politically_, the new regime would make a very big blunder,
as it would at once set the mass of the peasantry against the town
proletariat as the leader of the revolutionary policy.

Further, equal distribution of the land presupposes that the employment
of hired labour will be prohibited by law. The abolition of wage labour
can and must be a _consequence_ of economic reform, but it cannot be
predetermined by juridical prohibition. It is not sufficient to forbid
the capitalist landlord to employ wage-labour, it is necessary first of
all to secure for the landless labourer the possibility of existence –
and a rational existence from the social-economic point of view. Under
the programme of equalization of the use of land, forbidding the
employment of wage labour will mean, on the one hand, compelling the
landless labourers to settle on tiny scraps of land and, on the other,
obliging the government to provide them with the necessary stock and
implements for their socially-irrational production.

It is of course understood that the intervention of the proletariat in
the organization of agriculture will begin not by binding scattered
labourers to scattered patches of land, but with the exploitation of
large estates by the State or the communes. Only when the socialization
of production has been placed well on its feet can the process of
socialization be advanced further, towards the prohibition of hired
labour. This will render small capitalist farming impossible, but will
still leave room for subsistence or semi-subsistence holdings, the
forcible expropriation of which in no way enters into the plans of the
socialist proletariat.

In any case, we cannot undertake to carry out a programme of equal
distribution which, on the one hand, presupposes an aimless, purely
formal expropriation of small holdings, and on the other, demands the
complete break-up of large estates into small pieces. This policy, being
directly wasteful from the economic standpoint, could only have a
reactionary-utopian ulterior motive, and above all would politically
weaken the revolutionary party.

But how far can the socialist policy of the working class be applied in
the economic conditions of Russia? We can say one thing with certainty –
that it will come up against political obstacles much sooner than it
will stumble over the technical backwardness of the country. _Without
the direct State support of the European proletariat the working class
of Russia cannot remain in power and convert its temporary domination
into a lasting socialistic dictatorship._ Of this there cannot for one
moment be any doubt. But on the other hand there cannot be any doubt
that a socialist revolution in the West will enable us directly to
convert the temporary domination of the working class into a socialist
dictatorship.

In 1904, Kautsky, discussing the prospects of social development and
calculating the possibility of an early revolution in Russia, wrote:
‘Revolution in Russia could not immediately result in a socialist
regime. The economic conditions of the country are not nearly mature for
this purpose.’ But the Russian revolution would certainly give a strong
impetus to the proletarian movement in the rest of Europe, and in
consequence of the struggle that would flare up, the proletariat might
come to power in Germany. ‘Such an outcome,’ continued Kautsky, ‘must
have an influence on the whole of Europe. It must lead to the political
domination of the proletariat in Western Europe and create for the
Eastern European proletariat the possibility of contracting the stages
of their development and, copying the example of the Germans,
_artificially setting up socialist institutions_. Society as a whole
cannot artificially skip any stages of its development, but it is
possible for constituent parts of society to hasten their retarded
development by imitating the more advanced countries and, thanks to
this, even to take their stand in the forefront of development, because
they are not burdened with the ballast of tradition which the older
countries have to drag along ... This may happen,’ says Kautsky, ‘but,
as we have already said, here we leave the field of inevitability and
enter that of _possibility_, and so things may happen otherwise.’

These lines were written by this German Social-Democratic theoretician
at a time when he was considering the question whether a revolution
would break out first in Russia or in the West. Later on, the Russian
proletariat revealed a colossal strength, unexpected by the Russian
Social-Democrats even in their most optimistic moods. The course of the
Russian revolution was decided, so far as its fundamental features were
concerned. What two or three years ago was or seemed _possible_,
approached to the _probable_, and everything points to the fact that it
is on the brink of becoming _inevitable_.



IX EUROPE AND REVOLUTION


 

 

In June 1905 we wrote:

‘More than half a century has passed since 1848, half a century of
unceasing conquests by capitalism throughout the whole world; half a
century of mutual adaptation between the forces of bourgeois reaction
and of feudal reaction; half a century during which the bourgeoisie has
revealed its mad lust for domination and its readiness to fight savagely
for this.

‘Just as a seeker after perpetual motion comes up against ever fresh
obstacles, and piles up machine after machine for the purpose of
overcoming them, so the bourgeoisie has changed and reconstructed its
state apparatus while avoiding “extra-legal” conflict with the forces
hostile to it. But just as our seeker after perpetual motion eventually
comes up against the final insurmountable obstacle of the law of the
conservation of energy, so the bourgeoisie must eventually come up
against the final insurmountable obstacle in its path: the class
antagonism, which will inevitably be settled by conflict.

‘Binding all countries together with its mode of production and its
commerce, capitalism has converted the whole world into a single
economic and political organism. Just as modern credit binds thousands
of undertakings by invisible ties and gives to capital an incredible
mobility which prevents many small bankruptcies but at the same time is
the cause of the unprecedented sweep of general economic crises, so the
whole economic and political effort of capitalism, its world trade, its
system of monstrous state debts, and the political groupings of nations
which draw all the forces of reaction into a kind of world-wide
joint-stock company, has not only resisted all individual political
crises, but also prepared the basis for a social crisis of unheard-of
dimensions. Driving all the processes of disease beneath the surface,
avoiding all difficulties, putting off all the profound questions of
internal and international politics, and glossing over all
contradictions, the bourgeoisie has managed to postpone the denouement,
but thereby has prepared a radical liquidation of its rule on a
world-wide scale. The bourgeoisie has greedily clutched at every
reactionary force without inquiring as to its origin. The Pope and the
Sultan were not the least of its friends. The only reason why it did not
establish bonds of “friendship” with the Emperor of China was because he
did not represent any force. It was much more advantageous for the
bourgeoisie to plunder his dominions than to maintain him in its service
as its gendarme, paying him out of its own coffers. We thus see that the
world bourgeoisie has made the stability of its State system profoundly
dependent on the unstable pre-bourgeois bulwarks of reaction.

‘This immediately gives the events now unfolding an international
character, and opens up a wide horizon. The political emancipation of
Russia led by the working class will raise that class to a height as yet
unknown in history, will transfer to it colossal power and resources,
and will make it the initiator of the liquidation of world capitalism,
for which history has created all the objective conditions.’ [1]

If the Russian proletariat, having temporarily obtained power, does not
on its own initiative carry the revolution on to European soil, it will
be _compelled_ to do so by the forces of European feudal-bourgeois
reaction. Of course it would be idle at this moment to determine the
methods by which the Russian revolution will throw itself against old
capitalist Europe. These methods may reveal themselves quite
unexpectedly. Let us take the example of Poland as a link between the
revolutionary East and the revolutionary West, although we take this as
an illustration of our idea rather than as an actual prediction.

The triumph of the revolution in Russia will mean the inevitable victory
of the revolution in Poland. It is not difficult to imagine that the
existence of a revolutionary regime in the ten provinces of Russian
Poland must lead to the revolt of Galicia and Poznan. The Hohenzollern
and Habsburg Governments will reply to this by sending military forces
to the Polish frontier in order then to cross it for the purpose of
crushing their enemy at his very centre – Warsaw. It is quite clear that
the Russian revolution cannot leave its Western advance-guard in the
hands of the Prusso-Austrian soldiery. War against the governments of
Wilhelm II and Franz Josef under such circumstances would become an act
of self-defence on the part of the revolutionary government of Russia.
What attitude would the Austrian and German proletariat take up then? It
is evident that they could not remain calm while the armies of their
countries were conducting a counterrevolutionary crusade. A war between
feudal-bourgeois Germany and revolutionary Russia would lead inevitably
to a proletarian revolution in Germany. We would tell those to whom this
assertion seems too categorical to try and think of any other historical
event which would be more likely to compel the German workers and the
German reactionaries to make an open trial of strength.

When our October ministry unexpectedly placed Poland under martial law,
a highly plausible rumour went round to the effect that this was done on
direct instructions from Berlin. On the eve of the dispersal of the Duma
the government newspapers published, presenting them as threats,
communications concerning negotiations between the governments of Berlin
and Vienna with a view to armed intervention in the internal affairs of
Russia, for the purpose of suppressing sedition. No ministerial denial
of any sort could wipe out the effect of the shock which this
communication gave. It was clear that in the palaces of three
neighbouring countries a bloody counter-revolutionary revenge was being
prepared. How could things be otherwise? Could the neighbouring
semi-feudal monarchies stand passively by while the flames of revolution
licked the frontiers of their realms?

The Russian revolution, while as yet far from being victorious, had
already had its effect on Galicia through Poland. ‘Who could have
foreseen a year ago’, cried Daszynski, at the conference of the Polish
Social-Democratic Party in Lvov in May this year, ‘what is now taking
place in Galicia? This great peasant movement has spread astonishment
throughout the whole of Austria. Zbaraz elects a Social-Democrat as
vice-marshal of the regional council. Peasants publish a
socialist-revolutionary newspaper for peasants, entitled THE RED FLAG,
great mass meetings of peasants, 30,000 strong, are held, processions
with red flags and revolutionary songs parade through Galician villages,
once so calm and apathetic ... What will happen when from Russia the cry
of the nationalization of the land reaches these poverty-stricken
peasants?’. In his argument with the Polish Socialist Lusnia, more than
two years ago, Kautsky pointed out that Russia must no longer be
regarded as a weighted ball on the feet of Poland, or Poland regarded as
an Eastern detachment of revolutionary Europe thrust like a wedge into
the steppes of Muscovite barbarism. In the event of the development and
the victory of the Russian revolution, the Polish question, according to
Kautsky, ‘will again become acute, but not in the sense that Lusnia
thought. It will be directed not against Russia but against Austria and
Germany, and in so far as Poland will serve the cause of revolution its
task will be not to defend the revolution against Russia, but to carry
it further into Austria and Germany’. This prophecy is much nearer
realization than Kautsky may have thought.

But a revolutionary Poland is not at all the only starting-point for a
revolution in Europe. We pointed out above that the bourgeoisie has
systematically abstained from solving many complex and acute questions
affecting both internal and foreign politics. Having placed huge masses
of men under arms, the bourgeois governments are unable, however, to cut
with the sword through the tangle of international politics. Only a
government which has the backing of the nation whose vital interests are
affected, or a government that has lost the ground from under its feet
and is inspired by the courage of despair, can send hundreds and
thousands of men into battle. Under modern conditions of political
culture, military science, universal suffrage and universal military
service, only profound confidence or crazy adventurism can thrust two
nations into conflict. In the Franco-Prussian war of 1870 we had on the
one side Bismarck struggling for the Prussianizing of Germany, which
after all meant national unity, an elementary necessity recognized by
every German, and on the other hand the government of Napoleon III,
impudent, powerless, despised by the nation, ready for any adventure
that promised to secure for it another 12 months’ lease of life. The
same division of roles obtained in the Russo-Japanese war. On the one
hand we had the government of the Mikado, as yet unopposed by a
revolutionary proletariat, fighting for the domination of Japanese
capital in the Far East, and on the other an autocratic government which
had outlived its time striving to redeem its internal defeats by
victories abroad.

In the old capitalist countries there are no ‘national’ demands, i.e.,
demands of _bourgeois society as a whole_, of which the ruling
bourgeoisie could claim to be the champions. The governments of France,
Britain, Germany and Austria are unable to conduct national wars. The
vital interests of the masses, the interests of the oppressed
nationalities, or the barbarous internal politics of a neighbouring
country are not able to drive a single bourgeois government into a war
which could have a liberating and therefore a national character. On the
other hand, the interests of capitalist grabbing, which from time to
time induce now one and now another government to clank its spurs and
rattle its sabre in the face of the world, cannot arouse any response
among the masses. For that reason the bourgeoisie either cannot or will
not proclaim or conduct any national wars. What modern anti-national
wars will lead to has been seen recently from two experiences – in South
Africa and in the Far East.

The severe defeat of imperialist Conservatism in Britain is not in the
last resort due to the lesson of the Boer war; a much more important and
more menacing consequence of imperialist policy (menacing to the
bourgeoisie) is the political self-determination of the British
proletariat, which, once begun, will advance with seven-league strides.
As for the consequences of the Russo-Japanese war for the Petrograd
Government, these are so well known that it is not necessary to dwell on
them. But even without these two experiences, European governments, from
the moment the proletariat began to stand on its own feet, have always
feared to place before it the choice of war or revolution. It is
precisely this fear of the revolt of the proletariat that compels the
bourgeois parties, even while voting monstrous sums for military
expenditure, to make solemn declarations in favour of peace, to dream of
International Arbitration Courts and even of the organization of a
United States of Europe. These pitiful declarations can, of course,
abolish neither antagonisms between states nor armed conflicts.

The armed peace which arose in Europe after the Franco-Prussian War was
based on a European balance of power which presupposed not only the
inviolability of Turkey, the partition of Poland and the preservation of
Austria, that ethnographical harlequin’s cloak, but also the maintenance
of Russian despotism, armed to the teeth, as the gendarme of European
reaction. The Russo-Japanese war, however, delivered a severe blow to
this artificially maintained system in which the autocracy occupied a
foremost position. Russia for a time fell out of the so-called concert
of powers. The balance of power was destroyed. On the other hand,
Japan’s successes aroused the aggressive instincts of the capitalist
bourgeoisie, especially the stock exchanges, which play a very big part
in contemporary politics. The possibility of a war on European territory
grew to a very high degree. Conflicts are ripening everywhere, and if up
till now they have been allayed by diplomatic means, there is no
guarantee, however, that these means can be successful for long. But a
European war inevitably means a European revolution.

During the Russo-Japanese war the Socialist Party of France declared
that if the French Government intervened in favour of the autocracy, it
would call upon the proletariat to take most resolute measures, even to
the extent of revolt. In March 1906, when the Franco-German conflict
over Morocco was coming to a head, the International Socialist Bureau
resolved, in the event of a danger of war, to ‘lay down the most
advantageous methods of action for all international socialist parties
and for the whole organized working class in order to prevent war or
bring it to an end’. Of course this was only a resolution. It requires a
war to test its real significance, but the bourgeoisie has every reason
to avoid such a test. Unfortunately for the bourgeoisie, however, the
logic of international relations is stronger than the logic of
diplomacy.

The State bankruptcy of Russia, no matter whether it be the result of
the continued management of affairs by the bureaucracy or whether it be
declared by a revolutionary government which will refuse to pay for the
sins of the old regime, will have a terrible effect upon France. The
Radicals, who now have the political destiny of France in their hands,
in taking power have also undertaken all the functions of protecting the
interests of capital. For that reason there is every ground for assuming
that the financial crisis arising from the bankruptcy of Russia will
directly repeat itself in France in the form of an acute political
crisis which can end only with the transference of power into the hands
of the proletariat. In one way or another, either through a revolution
in Poland, through the consequences of a European war, or as the result
of the State bankruptcy of Russia, revolution will cross into the
territories of old capitalist Europe.

But even without the outside pressure of events such as war or
bankruptcy, revolution may arise in the near future in one of the
European countries as a consequence of the extreme sharpening of the
class struggle. We will not attempt to build assumptions now as to which
of the European countries will be the first to take the path of
revolution; of one thing there is no doubt, and that is that the class
contradictions in all European countries during recent times have
reached a high level of intensity.

The colossal growth of Social Democracy in Germany, within the framework
of a semi-absolutist constitution, will with iron necessity lead the
proletariat to an open clash with the feudal-bourgeois monarchy. The
question of offering resistance to a political coup d’etat by means of a
general strike has in the last year become one of the central questions
in the political life of the German proletariat. In France, the
transition of power to the Radicals decisively unties the hands of the
proletariat, which were for a long time bound by co-operation with the
bourgeois parties in the struggle against nationalism and clericalism.
The Socialist Party, rich in the deathless traditions of four
revolutions, and the conservative bourgeoisie, screening themselves
behind the mask of Radicalism, stand face to face. In Britain, where for
a century the two bourgeois parties have been regularly operating the
see-saw of parliamentarism, the proletariat under the influence of a
whole series of factors have just recently taken the path of political
separation. While in Germany this process took four decades, the British
working class, possessing powerful trade unions and being rich in
experience of economic struggle, may in a few leaps overtake the army of
continental socialism.

The influence of the Russian revolution upon the European proletariat is
tremendous. Besides destroying Russian absolutism, the main force of
European reaction, it will create the necessary prerequisites for
revolution in the consciousness and temper of the European working
class.

The function of the socialist parties was and is to revolutionize the
consciousness of the working class, just as the development of
capitalism revolutionized social relations. But the work of agitation
and organization among the ranks of the proletariat has an internal
inertia. The European Socialist Parties, particularly the largest of
them, the German Social-Democratic Party, have developed their
conservatism in proportion as the great masses have embraced socialism
and the more these masses have become organized and disciplined. As a
consequence of this, Social Democracy as an organization embodying the
political experience of the proletariat may at a certain moment become a
direct obstacle to open conflict between the workers and bourgeois
reaction. In other words, the propagandist-socialist conservatism of the
proletarian parties may at a certain moment hold back the direct
struggle of the proletariat for power. The tremendous influence of the
Russian revolution indicates that it will destroy party routine and
conservatism, and place the question of an open trial of strength
between the proletariat and capitalist reaction on the order of the day.
The struggle for universal suffrage in Austria, Saxony and Prussia has
become acute under the direct influence of the October strikes in
Russia. The revolution in the East will infect the Western proletariat
with a revolutionary idealism and rouse a desire to speak to their
enemies ‘in Russian’. Should the Russian proletariat find itself in
power, if only as the result of a temporary conjuncture of circumstances
in our bourgeois revolution, it will encounter the organized hostility
of world reaction, and on the other hand will find a readiness on the
part of the world proletariat to give organized support.

Left to its own resources, the working class of Russia will inevitably
be crushed by the counter-revolution the moment the peasantry turns its
back on it. It will have no alternative but to link the fate of its
political rule, and, hence, the fate of the whole Russian revolution,
with the fate of the socialist revolution in Europe. That colossal
state-political power given it by a temporary conjuncture of
circumstances in the Russian bourgeois revolution it will cast into the
scales of the class struggle of the entire capitalist world. With state
power in its hands, with counter-revolution behind it and European
reaction in front of it, it will send forth to its comrades the world
over the old rallying cry, which this time will be a call for the last
attack: _Workers of all countries, unite!_

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. See my foreword to F. Lassalle’s ADDRESS TO THE JURY, published by
MOLOT. – _L.T._



X THE STRUGGLE FOR POWER [1]


 

 

We have before us a leaflet on our programme and tactics entitled: _The
Tasks Confronting the Russian Proletariat – A Letter to Comrades in
Russia_. This document is signed by P. Axelrod, Astrov, A. Martynov, L.
Martov and S. Semkovsky.

The problem of the revolution is outlined in this ‘letter’ in very
general fashion, clarity and precision disappearing in proportion as the
authors turn from describing the situation created by the war to the
political prospects and tactical conclusions; the very terminology
becomes diffuse and the social definitions ambiguous.

Two moods seem from abroad to prevail in Russia: in the first place,
concern for national defence – from the Romanovs to Plekhanov – and
secondly, universal discontent – from the oppositional bureaucratic
Fronde to the outbreaks of street rioting. These two pervading moods
also create an illusion of a future popular freedom which is to arise
out of the cause of national defence. But these two moods are in large
measure responsible for the indefiniteness with which the question of
‘popular revolution’ is presented, even when it is formally counterposed
to ‘national defence’.

The war itself, with its defeats, has not created the revolutionary
problem nor any revolutionary forces for its solution. History for us
does not commence with the surrender of Warsaw to the Prince of Bavaria.
Both the revolutionary contradictions and the social forces are the same
as those which we first encountered in 1905, only very considerably
modified by the ensuing ten years. The war has merely revealed in a
mechanically graphic way the objective bankruptcy of the regime. At the
same time it has brought confusion into the social consciousness, in
which ‘everybody’ seems infected with the desire to resist Hindenburg as
well as with hatred towards the regime of 3rd June. But as the
organization of a ‘people’s war’ from the very first moment comes up
against the Tsarist police, thereby revealing that the Russia of 3rd
June is a fact, and that a ‘people’s war’ is a fiction, so the approach
to a ‘people’s revolution’ at the very threshold comes up against the
socialist police of Plekhanov, whom, together with his entire suite, one
might regard as a fiction if behind him there did not stand Kerensky,
Milyukov, Guchkov and in general the non-revolutionary and
anti-revolutionary national-democrats and national-liberals.

The ‘letter’ cannot of course ignore the class division of the nation,
or that the nation must by means of revolution save itself from the
consequences of the war and the present regime. ‘The nationalists and
Octobrists, the progressists, the Cadets, the industrialists and even
part (!) of the radical intelligentsia proclaim with one voice the
inability of the bureaucracy to defend the country and demand the
mobilization of social forces for the cause of defence ...’ The letter
draws the correct conclusion regarding the anti-revolutionary character
of this position, which assumes ‘unity with the present rulers of
Russia, with the bureaucrats, nobles and generals, in the cause of
defence of the State’. The letter also correctly points out the
anti-revolutionary position of ‘bourgeois patriots of all shades’; and
we may add, of the social-patriots, of whom the letter makes no mention
at all.

From this we must draw the conclusion that the Social-Democrats are not
merely the most logical revolutionary party but that they are the only
revolutionary party in the country; that, side by side with them, there
are not only groups which are less resolute in the application of
revolutionary methods, but also non-revolutionary parties. In other
words, that the Social- Democratic Party, in its revolutionary way of
presenting problems, is quite isolated _in the open political arena_, in
spite of the ‘universal discontent’. This first conclusion must be very
carefully taken into account.

Of course, parties are not classes. Between the position of a party and
the interests of the social stratum upon which it rests, there may be a
certain lack of harmony which later on may become converted into a
profound contradiction. The conduct of a party may change under the
influence of the temper of the masses. This is indisputable. All the
more reason therefore for us, in our calculations, to cease relying on
less stable and less trustworthy elements such as the slogans and
tactics of a party, and to refer to more stable historical factors: to
the social structure of the nation, to the relation of class forces and
the tendencies of development.

Yet the authors of the ‘letter’ completely avoid these questions. What
is this ‘people’s revolution’ in the Russia of 1915? Our authors simply
tell us that it ‘must’ be made by the proletariat and the democracy. We
know what the proletariat is, but what is ‘the democracy’? Is it a
political party? From what has been said above, evidently not. Is it
then the masses? What masses? Evidently it is the petty industrial and
commercial bourgeoisie, the intelligentsia and the peasantry – it can
only be of these that they are speaking.

In a series of articles entitled ‘The War Crisis and Political
Prospects’ we have given a general estimation of the possible
revolutionary significance of these social forces. Basing ourselves on
the experience of the last revolution, we inquired into the changes
which the last ten years have brought about in the relation of forces
that obtained in 1905: have these been _in favour_ of democracy (the
bourgeoisie) or _against_ it? This is the central historical question in
judging the prospects of the revolution and the tactics of the
proletariat. Has bourgeois democracy in Russia become stronger since
1905, or has it still further declined? All our former discussions
centred round the question of the fate of bourgeois democracy, and those
who are still unable to give a reply to this question are groping in the
dark. We reply to this question by saying that _a national bourgeois
revolution is impossible in Russia because there is no genuinely
revolutionary bourgeois democracy_. The time for national revolutions
has passed – at least for Europe – just as the time for national wars
has passed. Between the one and the other there is an inherent
connection. We are living in an epoch of imperialism which is not merely
a system of colonial conquests but implies also a definite regime at
home. It does not set the bourgeois nation in opposition to the old
regime, but sets the proletariat in opposition to the bourgeois nation.

The petty-bourgeois artisans and traders already played an insignificant
role in the revolution of 1905. There is no question that the social
importance of this class has declined still further during the last ten
years. Capitalism in Russia deals much more radically and severely with
the intermediate classes than it does in the countries with an older
economic development. The intelligentsia has undoubtedly grown
numerically, and its economic role also has increased. But at the same
time even its former illusory ‘independence’ has entirely disappeared.
The social significance of the intelligentsia is wholly determined by
its functions in organizing capitalist industry and bourgeois public
opinion. Its material connection with capitalism has saturated it with
imperialist tendencies. As already quoted, the ‘letter’ says, ‘even part
of the radical intelligentsia ... demands the mobilization of social
forces for the cause of defence’. This is absolutely untrue; not _a
part_, but _the whole_ of the radical intelligentsia; in fact, one
should say, not only the whole radical section, but a considerable, if
not the greater part of the socialist intelligentsia. We shall hardly
increase the ranks of ‘democracy’ by painting-up the character of the
intelligentsia.

Thus the industrial and commercial bourgeoisie has declined still
further while the intelligentsia have abandoned their revolutionary
position. Urban democracy as a revolutionary factor is not worth
mentioning. Only the peasantry remains, but as far as we know, neither
Axelrod nor Martov ever set great hopes upon its independent
revolutionary role. Have they come to the conclusion that the unceasing
class differentiation among the peasantry during the last ten years has
increased this role? Such a supposition would be flying in the face of
all theoretical conclusions and all historical experience.

But in that case, what kind of ‘democracy’ does the letter mean? And in
what sense do they speak of ‘people’s revolution’?

The slogan of a constituent assembly presupposes a revolutionary
situation. Is there one? Yes, there is, but it is not in the least
expressed in the supposed birth, at last, of a bourgeois democracy which
is alleged to be now ready and able to settle accounts with Tsarism. On
the contrary, if there is anything that this war has revealed quite
clearly, it is the absence of a revolutionary democracy in the country.

The attempt of the Russia of 3rd June to solve the internal
revolutionary problems by the path of imperialism has resulted in an
obvious fiasco. This does not mean that the responsible or
semi-responsible parties of the 3rd June regime will take the path of
revolution, but it does mean that the revolutionary problem laid bare by
the military catastrophe, which will drive the ruling class still
further along the path of imperialism, doubles the importance of the
only revolutionary class in the country.

The bloc of 3rd June is shaken, rent by internal friction and conflict.
This does not mean that the Octobrists and Cadets are considering the
revolutionary problem of power and preparing to storm the positions of
the bureaucracy and the united nobility. But it does mean that the
government’s power to resist revolutionary pressure undoubtedly has been
weakened for a certain period.

The monarchy and the bureaucracy are discredited, but this does not mean
that they will give up power without a fight. The dispersal of the Duma
and the latest ministerial changes showed whoever needed showing how far
from the facts this supposition is. But the policy of bureaucratic
instability, which will develop still further, should greatly assist the
revolutionary mobilization of the proletariat by the Social Democrats.

The lower classes of the towns and villages will become more and more
exhausted, deceived, dissatisfied and enraged. This does not mean that
an independent force of revolutionary democracy will operate side by
side with the proletariat. For such a force there is neither social
material nor leading personnel; but it undoubtedly does mean that the
deep dissatisfaction of the lower classes will assist the revolutionary
pressure of the working class.

The less the proletariat waits upon the appearance of bourgeois
democracy, the less it adapts itself to the passivity and limitations of
the petty bourgeoisie and peasantry, the more resolute and
irreconcilable its fight becomes, the more obvious becomes its
preparedness to go to ‘the end’, i.e., to the conquest of power, the
greater will be its chances at the decisive moment of carrying with it
the non-proletarian masses. Nothing, of course, will be accomplished by
merely putting forward mere slogans such as ‘for the confiscation of
land’, etc. This to a still greater extent applies to the army, by which
the government stands or falls. The mass of the army will only incline
towards the revolutionary class when it becomes convinced that it is not
merely grumbling and demonstrating, but is fighting for power and has
some chances of winning it. There is an objective revolutionary problem
in the country – the problem of political power – which has been
glaringly revealed by the war and the defeats. There is a progressive
disorganization of the ruling class. There is a growing dissatisfaction
among the urban and rural masses. But the only revolutionary factor
which can take advantage of this situation is the proletariat – now to
an incomparably greater degree than in 1905.

The ‘letter’ would appear, in one phrase, to approach this central point
of the question. It says that the Russian Social-Democratic workers
should take ‘the lead in this national struggle for the overthrow of the
monarchy of 3rd June’. What ‘national’ struggle may mean we have just
indicated. But if ‘take the lead’ does not merely mean that the advanced
workers should magnanimously shed their blood without asking themselves
for what purpose, but means that the workers must take the _political
leadership_ of the whole struggle, which above all will be a proletarian
struggle, then it is clear that _victory in this struggle must transfer
power to the class that has led the struggle, i.e, the Social-Democratic
proletariat_.

The question, therefore, is not simply one of a ‘revolutionary
provisional government’ – an empty phrase to which the historical
process will have to give some kind of content, but of a _revolutionary
workers’ government_, the conquest of power by the Russian proletariat.
The demands for a national constituent assembly, a republic, an
eight-hour day, the confiscation of the land of the landlords, together
with the demands for the immediate cessation of the war, the right of
nations to self-determination, and a United States of Europe will play a
tremendous part in the agitational role of the Social Democrats. But
revolution is first and foremost a question of power – not of the state
form (constituent assembly, republic, united states) but of the social
content of the government. The demands for a constituent assembly and
the confiscation of land under present conditions lose all direct
revolutionary significance without the readiness of the proletariat to
fight for the conquest of power; for if the proletariat does not tear
power out of the hands of the monarchy nobody else will do so.

The tempo of the revolutionary process is a special question. It depends
upon a number of military and political, national and international
factors. These factors may retard or hasten developments, facilitate the
revolutionary victory or lead to another defeat. But whatever the
conditions may be the proletariat must clearly see its path and take it
consciously. Above everything else it must be free from illusions. And
the worst illusion in all its history from which the proletariat has up
till now suffered has always been reliance upon others.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. From NASHE SLOVO (Paris), October 17, 1915. – _L.T._
